4274 | damage (noun): a change for the worse, harm done | loc: škoda
  EN TS: Just a "little" damage.
  cz TS: Jen „malá“ škoda.
  EN FS: Just a "little" snow.
  cz FS: Jen „trocha“ sněhu.
  EN TP: damage to a parked car
  cz TP: škoda na zaparkovaném autě
  EN FP: damage to a bicycle
  cz FP: škoda na kole
4275 | complain (verb): to express displeasure or unhappiness | loc: stěžovat si | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is complaining about the car.
  cz TS: Stěžuje si na auto.
  EN FS: She is complaining about the bike.
  cz FS: Stěžuje si na kolo.
  EN TP: to complain about a crash
  cz TP: stěžovat si na nehodu
  EN FP: to complain about the food
  cz FP: stěžovat si na jídlo
4276 | elderly (adjective): advanced in years, old | loc: starší
  EN TS: An elderly lady is going home.
  cz TS: Starší paní jde domů.
  EN FS: An elderly man is going home.
  cz FS: Starší pán jde domů.
  EN TP: an elderly woman walking
  cz TP: starší žena na procházce
  EN FP: an elderly woman dancing
  cz FP: starší žena při tanci
4277 | accountant (noun): someone who keeps and checks business accounts | loc: účetní
  EN TS: The accountant found it!
  cz TS: Účetní to našel!
  EN FS: The accountant lost it!
  cz FS: Účetní to ztratil!
  EN TP: an accountant with receipts
  cz TP: účetní s účtenkami
  EN FP: an accountant on holiday
  cz FP: účetní na dovolené
4279 | theatre (noun): a building where plays or films are shown | loc: divadlo
  EN TS: Nobody came to the theatre!
  cz TS: Do divadla nikdo nepřišel!
  EN FS: Nobody came to the stadium!
  cz FS: Na stadion nikdo nepřišel!
  EN TP: a theatre stage
  cz TP: jeviště v divadle
  EN FP: a theatre ticket
  cz FP: lístek do divadla
4280 | filming (noun): the act of making a film | loc: natáčení
  EN TS: Filming day: she is in tears.
  cz TS: Den natáčení: je celá v slzách.
  EN FS: Filming day: she is laughing.
  cz FS: Den natáčení: celá se směje.
  EN TP: filming a sad scene
  cz TP: natáčení smutné scény
  EN FP: filming a cooking show
  cz FP: natáčení kuchařské show
4281 | change (noun): when something passes from one state to another | loc: změna
  EN TS: The colour change is amazing.
  cz TS: Ta změna barvy je úžasná.
  EN FS: The size change is amazing.
  cz FS: Ta změna velikosti je úžasná.
  EN TP: a change of colour
  cz TP: změna barvy
  EN FP: a change of clothes
  cz FP: změna oblečení
4282 | shelter (noun): a place that cares for animals with no home | loc: útulek
  EN TS: They got a dog from a shelter.
  cz TS: Vzali si psa z útulku.
  EN FS: They got a cat from a shelter.
  cz FS: Vzali si kočku z útulku.
  EN TP: a dog from a shelter
  cz TP: pes z útulku
  EN FP: a shelter from the rain
  cz FP: úkryt před deštěm
4283 | cooking (noun): preparing food with heat | loc: vaření
  EN TS: Her cooking gets applause!
  cz TS: Její vaření sklízí potlesk!
  EN FS: Her singing gets applause!
  cz FS: Její zpěv sklízí potlesk!
  EN TP: a cooking class
  cz TP: kurz vaření
  EN FP: a cooking contest
  cz FP: soutěž ve vaření
4284 | rush (noun): the act of moving hurriedly and carelessly | loc: spěch
  EN TS: He is leaving in a rush!
  cz TS: Odjíždí ve spěchu!
  EN FS: He is leaving in a car!
  cz FS: Odjíždí v autě!
  EN TP: a morning rush
  cz TP: ranní spěch
  EN FP: a rush hour
  cz FP: dopravní špička
4285 | adult (noun): a fully grown person | loc: dospělý
  EN TS: Adult life means bills.
  cz TS: Dospělý život? Samé složenky.
  EN FS: Adult life means games.
  cz FS: Dospělý život? Samé hry.
  EN TP: an adult going to work
  cz TP: dospělý jde do práce
  EN FP: an adult going to bed
  cz FP: dospělý jde spát
4286 | fan (verb): to move the air with something, like a fan | loc: ovívat
  EN TS: She is fanning herself.
  cz TS: Ovívá se.
  EN FS: She is fanning the cat.
  cz FS: Ovívá kočku.
  EN TP: fanning herself in the heat
  cz TP: ovívat se v horku
  EN FP: fanning a barbecue fire
  cz FP: ovívat oheň na grilu
4287 | view (verb): to look at something carefully | loc: prohlížet si
  EN TS: They are viewing the flat.
  cz TS: Prohlížejí si byt.
  EN FS: They are viewing the car.
  cz FS: Prohlížejí si auto.
  EN TP: viewing an empty flat
  cz TP: prohlížet si prázdný byt
  EN FP: viewing a used car
  cz FP: prohlížet si ojeté auto
4288 | target (noun): a point or object to shoot at | loc: terč
  EN TS: She is focusing on the target.
  cz TS: Soustředí se na terč.
  EN FS: She is focusing on the camera.
  cz FS: Soustředí se na kameru.
  EN TP: three round targets
  cz TP: tři kulaté terče
  EN FP: a target on a wall
  cz FP: terč na zdi
4289 | cold (noun): the absence of heat | loc: chlad
  EN TS: The cold is blowing her back!
  cz TS: Chlad ji odfukuje dozadu!
  EN FS: The heat is blowing her back!
  cz FS: Horko ji odfukuje dozadu!
  EN TP: a blast of cold
  cz TP: závan chladu
  EN FP: a cold drink
  cz FP: studený nápoj
4290 | cool (verb): to make something cool or cooler | loc: chladit
  EN TS: Cold air is cooling him down.
  cz TS: Studený vzduch ho chladí.
  EN FS: Cold beer is cooling him down.
  cz FS: Studené pivo ho chladí.
  EN TP: cooling down under the vent
  cz TP: chladit se pod větrákem
  EN FP: cooling a drink with ice
  cz FP: chladit pití ledem
4291 | forehead (noun): the part of the face above the eyes | loc: čelo
  EN TS: He is cooling his forehead. So hot!
  cz TS: Chladí si čelo. Takové horko!
  EN FS: He is cooling his feet. So hot!
  cz FS: Chladí si nohy. Takové horko!
  EN TP: a glass on his forehead
  cz TP: sklenice na čele
  EN FP: a kiss on the forehead
  cz FP: pusa na čelo
4292 | breeze (noun): a slight, refreshing wind | loc: vánek
  EN TS: A breeze is moving her hair.
  cz TS: Vánek jí čechrá vlasy.
  EN FS: A fan is moving her hair.
  cz FS: Větrák jí čechrá vlasy.
  EN TP: a breeze in the meadow
  cz TP: vánek na louce
  EN FP: a breeze by the sea
  cz FP: vánek u moře
4293 | jet (noun): an airplane powered by jet engines | loc: proudové letadlo
  EN TS: The jet is taking off!
  cz TS: Proudové letadlo vzlétá!
  EN FS: The jet is landing!
  cz FS: Proudové letadlo přistává!
  EN TP: a jet taking off
  cz TP: vzlétající proudové letadlo
  EN FP: a jet of water
  cz FP: proud vody
4294 | low (adverb): in a low position, near the ground | loc: nízko
  EN TS: The plane is flying very low!
  cz TS: Letadlo letí hodně nízko!
  EN FS: The kite is flying very low!
  cz FS: Drak letí hodně nízko!
  EN TP: flying low over him
  cz TP: nízko nad ním
  EN FP: flying low over the sea
  cz FP: nízko nad mořem
4295 | photograph (verb): to take a picture on film or a camera | loc: fotografovat
  EN TS: Look, he's photographing a plane!
  cz TS: Hele, fotografuje letadlo!
  EN FS: Look, he's photographing a camel!
  cz FS: Hele, fotografuje velblouda!
  EN TP: photographing a landing jet
  cz TP: fotografovat přistávající letadlo
  EN FP: photographing the desert sand
  cz FP: fotografovat písek v poušti
4296 | signal (noun): a gesture or action that sends a message | loc: signál
  EN TS: Raised wands send a signal.
  cz TS: Zvednuté pálky dávají signál.
  EN FS: Raised flags send a signal.
  cz FS: Zvednuté vlajky dávají signál.
  EN TP: a signal to the pilot
  cz TP: signál pro pilota
  EN FP: a weak phone signal
  cz FP: slabý signál mobilu
4297 | departure (noun): the act of leaving, departing | loc: odchod | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "odchod" wrong for airport departures; used "odlet"
  EN TS: The departures board is huge!
  cz TS: Ta tabule odletů je obří!
  EN FS: The arrivals board is huge!
  cz FS: Ta tabule příletů je obří!
  EN TP: a huge departures board
  cz TP: obří tabule odletů
  EN FP: a departure by train
  cz FP: odjezd vlakem
4298 | straight (adverb): in a direct line, without deviation | loc: rovně
  EN TS: Boys are lining up straight.
  cz TS: Kluci se řadí pěkně rovně.
  EN FS: Girls are lining up straight.
  cz FS: Holky se řadí pěkně rovně.
  EN TP: lining up straight
  cz TP: řadit se rovně
  EN FP: going straight home
  cz FP: jít rovnou domů
4299 | react (verb): to show a response to something | loc: reagovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He reacts to cats. Poor guy.
  cz TS: Reaguje na kočky. Chudák.
  EN FS: He reacts to dogs. Poor guy.
  cz FS: Reaguje na psy. Chudák.
  EN TP: reacting to a cat
  cz TP: reagovat na kočku
  EN FP: reacting to bad news
  cz FP: reagovat na špatnou zprávu
4300 | rubbish (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: odpadky
  EN TS: Rubbish everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude odpadky!
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude květiny!
  EN TP: bins heaped with rubbish
  cz TP: popelnice přetékající odpadky
  EN FP: rubbish on a beach
  cz FP: odpadky na pláži
4301 | gap (noun): an empty space between things | loc: mezera
  EN TS: He is squeezing through a gap.
  cz TS: Protahuje se mezerou.
  EN FS: He is crawling through a gap.
  cz FS: Plazí se mezerou.
  EN TP: squeezing through a narrow gap
  cz TP: protahovat se úzkou mezerou
  EN FP: a gap in the fence
  cz FP: mezera v plotě
4302 | emergency (noun): a sudden crisis that needs immediate action | loc: nouzová situace
  EN TS: An emergency in the rain.
  cz TS: Nouzová situace v dešti.
  EN FS: An emergency in the snow.
  cz FS: Nouzová situace ve sněhu.
  EN TP: an emergency at night
  cz TP: nouzová situace v noci
  EN FP: an emergency exit door
  cz FP: dveře nouzového východu
4303 | medical (adjective): relating to medicine and doctors | loc: zdravotnický
  EN TS: A medical team is crossing.
  cz TS: Zdravotnický tým přechází.
  EN FS: A police team is crossing.
  cz FS: Policejní tým přechází.
  EN TP: a medical team crossing
  cz TP: zdravotnický tým na přechodu
  EN FP: a medical exam at school
  cz FP: lékařská prohlídka ve škole
4304 | football (noun): the oval ball used in American football | loc: míč na americký fotbal
  EN TS: He threw the football, nice.
  cz TS: Hodil míč na americký fotbal, pecka.
  EN FS: He kicked the football, nice.
  cz FS: Kopl do míče na americký fotbal, pecka.
  EN TP: an oval football mid-air
  cz TP: míč na americký fotbal v letu
  EN FP: a round football on grass
  cz FP: kulatý míč na trávě
4305 | boy (noun): a young male person | loc: kluk
  EN TS: The boy got a huge burger.
  cz TS: Kluk dostal obří burger.
  EN FS: The boy got a huge pizza.
  cz FS: Kluk dostal obří pizzu.
  EN TP: a boy getting a burger
  cz TP: kluk dostává burger
  EN FP: a boy cooking a burger
  cz FP: kluk griluje burger
4306 | prison (noun): a place where persons are locked up for punishment | loc: vězení
  EN TS: They are leaving prison!
  cz TS: Odcházejí z vězení!
  EN FS: They are entering prison!
  cz FS: Vcházejí do vězení!
  EN TP: leaving the prison
  cz TP: odchod z vězení
  EN FP: visiting a prison
  cz FP: návštěva ve vězení
4307 | banner (noun): a long strip of cloth or paper with a message | loc: transparent
  EN TS: Four banners are waving above.
  cz TS: Nahoře vlají čtyři transparenty.
  EN FS: Two banners are waving above.
  cz FS: Nahoře vlají dva transparenty.
  EN TP: banners above the stand
  cz TP: transparenty nad tribunou
  EN FP: banners above the shop
  cz FP: transparenty nad obchodem
4308 | supporter (noun): a person who backs a team or politician | loc: fanoušek
  EN TS: These supporters never stop singing.
  cz TS: Tihle fanoušci nikdy nepřestanou zpívat.
  EN FS: These supporters never stop dancing.
  cz FS: Tihle fanoušci nikdy nepřestanou tančit.
  EN TP: singing supporters
  cz TP: zpívající fanoušci
  EN FP: sleeping supporters
  cz FP: spící fanoušci
4309 | anthem (noun): a song of loyalty to a nation or school | loc: hymna
  EN TS: The anthem is making her cry.
  cz TS: Hymna ji dojímá k slzám.
  EN FS: The goal is making her cry.
  cz FS: Gól ji dojímá k slzám.
  EN TP: singing the anthem
  cz TP: zpívat hymnu
  EN FP: writing the anthem
  cz FP: psát hymnu
4310 | emotional (adjective): showing strong feelings openly | loc: emotivní
  EN TS: The emotional player is crying!
  cz TS: Emotivní hráč brečí!
  EN FS: The emotional player is laughing!
  cz FS: Emotivní hráč se směje!
  EN TP: an emotional team song
  cz TP: emotivní týmová píseň
  EN FP: an emotional wedding song
  cz FP: emotivní svatební píseň
4311 | young (adjective): in an early period of life | loc: mladý
  EN TS: Even grandma plays with the young man.
  cz TS: Dokonce i babička hraje s tím mladým klukem.
  EN FS: Even grandpa plays with the young man.
  cz FS: Dokonce i děda hraje s tím mladým klukem.
  EN TP: a young basketball player
  cz TP: mladý basketbalista
  EN FP: a young tennis player
  cz FP: mladý tenista
4312 | loud (adjective): producing sound of great volume | loc: hlasitý
  EN TS: He is loud, but nobody hears.
  cz TS: Je hlasitý, ale nikdo ho neslyší.
  EN FS: He is quiet, but nobody hears.
  cz FS: Je tichý, ale nikdo ho neslyší.
  EN TP: a loud call
  cz TP: hlasité volání
  EN FP: a loud party
  cz FP: hlasitá párty
4313 | pub (noun): a building with a bar where people drink | loc: hospoda
  EN TS: The whole pub is singing!
  cz TS: Zpívá celá hospoda!
  EN FS: The whole pub is sleeping!
  cz FS: Spí celá hospoda!
  EN TP: karaoke in a pub
  cz TP: karaoke v hospodě
  EN FP: a pub quiz night
  cz FP: kvízový večer v hospodě
4314 | orange (noun): a round orange citrus fruit | loc: pomeranč
  EN TS: Four oranges are in the bowl.
  cz TS: V misce jsou čtyři pomeranče.
  EN FS: Four apples are in the bowl.
  cz FS: V misce jsou čtyři jablka.
  EN TP: a bowl of oranges
  cz TP: miska pomerančů
  EN FP: a glass of orange juice
  cz FP: sklenice pomerančového džusu
4315 | price (noun): the amount of money something is sold for | loc: cena
  EN TS: The price keeps going up!
  cz TS: Cena pořád roste!
  EN FS: The price keeps going down!
  cz FS: Cena pořád klesá!
  EN TP: the price of a flat
  cz TP: cena bytu
  EN FP: the price of a car
  cz FP: cena auta
4316 | sorry (adjective): feeling regret over something you did | loc: kajícný
  EN TS: He is sorry. Tulips will help.
  cz TS: Je kajícný. Tulipány pomůžou.
  EN FS: He is sorry. Roses will help.
  cz FS: Je kajícný. Růže pomůžou.
  EN TP: sorry about the coffee
  cz TP: kajícný kvůli kafi
  EN FP: sorry about the cake
  cz FP: kajícný kvůli dortu
4317 | apologize (verb): to admit your faults and say sorry | loc: omluvit se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is apologizing with coffee.
  cz TS: Omlouvá se kávou.
  EN FS: He is apologizing with cake.
  cz FS: Omlouvá se dortem.
  EN TP: apologizing for a spill
  cz TP: omluvit se za polité kafe
  EN FP: apologizing for being late
  cz FP: omluvit se za zpoždění
4318 | applause (noun): showing approval by clapping the hands | loc: potlesk
  EN TS: His applause is growing.
  cz TS: Jeho potlesk sílí.
  EN FS: His laughter is growing.
  cz FS: Jeho smích sílí.
  EN TP: applause for the performer
  cz TP: potlesk pro umělce
  EN FP: applause for the team
  cz FP: potlesk pro tým
4319 | blend (verb): to combine things into one | loc: smíchat
  EN TS: The stripes are blending in.
  cz TS: Pruhy se postupně smíchají.
  EN FS: The stripes are growing wider.
  cz FS: Pruhy se postupně rozšíří.
  EN TP: blending cream into skin
  cz TP: smíchat pruhy krému
  EN FP: blending fruit in a mixer
  cz FP: smíchat ovoce v mixéru
4320 | plan (noun): a scale drawing of a building | loc: plán
  EN TS: He is drawing a plan.
  cz TS: Kreslí plán.
  EN FS: He is drawing a face.
  cz FS: Kreslí obličej.
  EN TP: drawing a house plan
  cz TP: kreslit plán domu
  EN FP: making a holiday plan
  cz FP: dělat plán dovolené
4321 | model (noun): a representation of something, often smaller | loc: model
  EN TS: She is fixing a city model.
  cz TS: Opravuje model města.
  EN FS: She is fixing a car model.
  cz FS: Opravuje model auta.
  EN TP: a model of a city
  cz TP: model města
  EN FP: a model on a catwalk
  cz FP: modelka na molu
4322 | dance (noun): an artistic form of moving to music | loc: tanec
  EN TS: What a beautiful dance!
  cz TS: Jaký krásný tanec!
  EN FS: What a beautiful car!
  cz FS: Jaké krásné auto!
  EN TP: a tango dance
  cz TP: tanec tango
  EN FP: a dance class
  cz FP: hodina tance
4323 | lane (noun): a narrow way or road | loc: ulička
  EN TS: Nice dance moves in the lane!
  cz TS: Pěkné taneční kreace v uličce!
  EN FS: Nice bike tricks in the lane!
  cz FS: Pěkné triky na kole v uličce!
  EN TP: a narrow painted lane
  cz TP: úzká pomalovaná ulička
  EN FP: a fast lane
  cz FP: rychlý pruh
4324 | vast (adjective): unusually great in size or extent | loc: obrovský
  EN TS: Vast glacier, tiny human.
  cz TS: Obrovský ledovec, maličký člověk.
  EN FS: Vast glacier, tiny penguin.
  cz FS: Obrovský ledovec, maličký tučňák.
  EN TP: a vast wall of ice
  cz TP: obrovská ledová stěna
  EN FP: a vast crowd of people
  cz FP: obrovský dav lidí
4325 | cattle (noun): cows and bulls as a group of farm animals | loc: dobytek
  EN TS: Fact: the cattle are grazing.
  cz TS: Fakt: dobytek se pase.
  EN FS: Fact: the horses are grazing.
  cz FS: Fakt: koně se pasou.
  EN TP: cattle grazing on a plain
  cz TP: dobytek pasoucí se na pláni
  EN FP: cattle in a barn
  cz FP: dobytek ve stáji
4326 | wood (noun): the hard substance under the bark of trees | loc: dřevo
  EN TS: The wood is burning.
  cz TS: Dřevo hoří.
  EN FS: The coal is burning.
  cz FS: Uhlí hoří.
  EN TP: burning wood
  cz TP: hořící dřevo
  EN FP: cutting wood
  cz FP: štípání dřeva
4327 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: barbecue
  EN TS: Everyone loves his barbecue!
  cz TS: Všichni milují jeho barbecue!
  EN FS: Everyone loves his salad!
  cz FS: Všichni milují jeho salát!
  EN TP: a sunset barbecue with friends
  cz TP: barbecue s kámoši při západu
  EN FP: a barbecue in the rain
  cz FP: barbecue v dešti
4328 | rug (noun): a thick heavy fabric floor covering | loc: koberec
  EN TS: The rug has a fringe.
  cz TS: Koberec má třásně.
  EN FS: The rug has a hole.
  cz FS: Koberec má díru.
  EN TP: a fringed rug
  cz TP: koberec s třásněmi
  EN FP: a rug on the wall
  cz FP: koberec na zdi
4329 | furniture (noun): the furnishings that make a room ready to use | loc: nábytek
  EN TS: They are sitting on furniture.
  cz TS: Sedí na nábytku.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the floor.
  cz FS: Sedí na podlaze.
  EN TP: sitting on soft furniture
  cz TP: sedět na měkkém nábytku
  EN FP: carrying the furniture
  cz FP: stěhovat nábytek
4330 | march (verb): to march in a procession | loc: pochodovat
  EN TS: The soldiers are marching.
  cz TS: Vojáci pochodují.
  EN FS: The soldiers are dancing.
  cz FS: Vojáci tančí.
  EN TP: soldiers marching in step
  cz TP: vojáci pochodující v kroku
  EN FP: soldiers marching at night
  cz FP: vojáci pochodující v noci
4331 | march (noun): walking with regular steps in a procession | loc: pochod
  EN TS: It is a very precise march.
  cz TS: Je to velmi precizní pochod.
  EN FS: It is a very messy march.
  cz FS: Je to velmi chaotický pochod.
  EN TP: a march down the street
  cz TP: pochod ulicí
  EN FP: a march in the forest
  cz FP: pochod lesem
4332 | arrest (verb): to take someone into custody | loc: zatknout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is arresting a burglar with rubber chickens.
  cz TS: Zatýká zloděje s gumovými kuřaty.
  EN FS: He is arresting a burglar with gold watches.
  cz FS: Zatýká zloděje se zlatými hodinkami.
  EN TP: arresting a burglar
  cz TP: zatknout zloděje
  EN FP: arresting a police officer
  cz FP: zatknout policistu
4333 | platform (noun): a raised flat surface | loc: platforma | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "platforma" unnatural for a station platform; used "nástupiště"
  EN TS: She stepped onto the platform.
  cz TS: Vešla na nástupiště.
  EN FS: She stepped onto the bus.
  cz FS: Vešla do autobusu.
  EN TP: a busy station platform
  cz TP: rušné nástupiště
  EN FP: a diving platform
  cz FP: skokanská plošina
4334 | studio (noun): a workplace for practising or teaching an art | loc: ateliér
  EN TS: She is painting in her studio.
  cz TS: Maluje ve svém ateliéru.
  EN FS: She is dancing in her studio.
  cz FS: Tančí ve svém ateliéru.
  EN TP: a painter's busy studio
  cz TP: rušný ateliér malířky
  EN FP: a recording studio
  cz FP: nahrávací studio
4335 | ask (verb): to inquire about something | loc: ptát se
  EN TS: The whole hall wants to ask!
  cz TS: Celý sál se chce ptát!
  EN FS: The whole hall wants to leave!
  cz FS: Celý sál chce odejít!
  EN TP: asking a question
  cz TP: ptát se z publika
  EN FP: asking for money
  cz FP: prosit o peníze
4336 | instructions (noun): a manual explaining how to use a device | loc: návod
  EN TS: He's reading the instructions, she's building.
  cz TS: On čte návod, ona staví.
  EN FS: He's reading the newspaper, she's building.
  cz FS: On čte noviny, ona staví.
  EN TP: reading the instructions
  cz TP: čtení návodu
  EN FP: ignoring the instructions
  cz FP: ignorování návodu
4337 | phone (verb): to get in touch with someone by telephone | loc: telefonovat
  EN TS: She is phoning and running!
  cz TS: Telefonuje a běží!
  EN FS: She is phoning and dancing!
  cz FS: Telefonuje a tančí!
  EN TP: phoning while running
  cz TP: telefonovat při běhu
  EN FP: phoning while driving
  cz FP: telefonovat při řízení
4338 | cash (noun): money in the form of bills or coins | loc: hotovost
  EN TS: The ATM is spitting out cash.
  cz TS: Bankomat chrlí hotovost.
  EN FS: The ATM is spitting out cards.
  cz FS: Bankomat chrlí karty.
  EN TP: cash flying out
  cz TP: vylétávající hotovost
  EN FP: cash in a wallet
  cz FP: hotovost v peněžence
4339 | bank (noun): a financial institution that keeps and lends money | loc: banka
  EN TS: Her bank card works!
  cz TS: Karta od banky jede!
  EN FS: Her bank card is broken!
  cz FS: Karta od banky nejede!
  EN TP: a row of bank machines
  cz TP: řada bankomatů v bance
  EN FP: a bank by the river
  cz FP: banka u řeky
4340 | chips (noun): strips of potato fried in deep fat | loc: hranolky
  EN TS: The gulls want his chips!
  cz TS: Racci chtějí jeho hranolky!
  EN FS: The dogs want his chips!
  cz FS: Psi chtějí jeho hranolky!
  EN TP: shielding his chips from gulls
  cz TP: chránit hranolky před racky
  EN FP: sharing chips with friends
  cz FP: dělit se o hranolky s přáteli
4341 | flee (verb): to run away quickly | loc: utéct | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is fleeing from the gulls!
  cz TS: Utíká před racky!
  EN FS: He is fleeing from the dogs!
  cz FS: Utíká před psy!
  EN TP: fleeing from the gulls
  cz TP: utíkat před racky
  EN FP: fleeing from a storm
  cz FP: utíkat před bouřkou
4342 | haul (verb): to pull something slowly and heavily | loc: táhnout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is hauling a heavy trunk.
  cz TS: Táhne těžký kufr.
  EN FS: She is hauling a heavy chair.
  cz FS: Táhne těžkou židli.
  EN TP: hauling a heavy trunk
  cz TP: táhnout těžký kufr
  EN FP: hauling a fishing net
  cz FP: táhnout rybářskou síť
4343 | laughter (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: smích
  EN TS: Laughter everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude smích!
  EN FS: Tears everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude slzy!
  EN TP: laughter in a playroom
  cz TP: smích v herně
  EN FP: laughter in a cinema
  cz FP: smích v kině
4344 | affection (noun): a warm feeling of liking someone | loc: náklonnost
  EN TS: Flour, pastries and affection.
  cz TS: Mouka, koláčky a náklonnost.
  EN FS: Flour, pizza and affection.
  cz FS: Mouka, pizza a náklonnost.
  EN TP: affection in the kitchen
  cz TP: náklonnost v kuchyni
  EN FP: affection for a pet
  cz FP: náklonnost k mazlíčkovi
4345 | joy (noun): the emotion of great happiness | loc: radost
  EN TS: Gifts, cake, pure joy!
  cz TS: Dárky, dort, čistá radost!
  EN FS: Gifts, pizza, pure joy!
  cz FS: Dárky, pizza, čistá radost!
  EN TP: joy at a birthday party
  cz TP: radost na narozeninové oslavě
  EN FP: joy at a wedding party
  cz FP: radost na svatební oslavě
4346 | hop (verb): to jump lightly | loc: poskakovat
  EN TS: Yo, kangaroos are hopping by.
  cz TS: Čus, kolem poskakujou klokani.
  EN FS: Yo, rabbits are hopping by.
  cz FS: Čus, kolem poskakujou králíci.
  EN TP: kangaroos hopping past
  cz TP: klokani poskakující kolem
  EN FP: hopping on one foot
  cz FP: poskakovat po jedné noze
4347 | ferry (verb): to transport people from one place to another | loc: převážet
  EN TS: A boat is ferrying her across.
  cz TS: Loďka ji převáží na druhou stranu.
  EN FS: A bus is ferrying her across.
  cz FS: Autobus ji převáží na druhou stranu.
  EN TP: to ferry people across
  cz TP: převážet lidi na druhý břeh
  EN FP: to ferry goods upriver
  cz FP: převážet zboží proti proudu
4348 | athletic (adjective): relating to athletes or sport | loc: atletický
  EN TS: She looks so athletic!
  cz TS: Ona vypadá tak atleticky!
  EN FS: He looks so athletic!
  cz FS: On vypadá tak atleticky!
  EN TP: an athletic surfer
  cz TP: atletická surfařka
  EN FP: an athletic club meeting
  cz FP: schůze atletického klubu
4349 | guard (noun): a person who keeps watch over something | loc: strážce
  EN TS: This guard can really surf.
  cz TS: Tenhle strážce fakt umí surfovat.
  EN FS: This guard can really ski.
  cz FS: Tenhle strážce fakt umí lyžovat.
  EN TP: a guard on a surfboard
  cz TP: strážce na surfu
  EN FP: a guard on a horse
  cz FP: strážce na koni
4350 | bell (noun): a hollow metal device that rings when struck | loc: zvon | translator note: loc "zvon" = church bell; a cow bell is "zvonec"
  EN TS: Each cow has a big bell.
  cz TS: Každá kráva má velký zvonec.
  EN FS: Each cow has a big horn.
  cz FS: Každá kráva má velký roh.
  EN TP: a bell on a cow
  cz TP: zvonec na krávě
  EN FP: a bell on a church
  cz FP: zvon na kostele
4351 | marble (noun): a hard rock that takes a high polish | loc: mramor
  EN TS: She is leaning on the marble.
  cz TS: Opírá se o mramor.
  EN FS: She is leaning on the piano.
  cz FS: Opírá se o klavír.
  EN TP: a polished marble railing
  cz TP: leštěné mramorové zábradlí
  EN FP: a marble garden statue
  cz FP: mramorová zahradní socha
4352 | turn (noun): the act of changing direction | loc: obrat
  EN TS: She is making a sharp turn.
  cz TS: Dělá prudký obrat.
  EN FS: She is making a sharp jump.
  cz FS: Dělá prudký skok.
  EN TP: a sharp turn on skis
  cz TP: prudký obrat na lyžích
  EN FP: a wrong turn on skis
  cz FP: chybný obrat na lyžích
4353 | dessert (noun): a sweet dish served at the end of a meal | loc: dezert
  EN TS: Great dessert, chef.
  cz TS: Skvělý dezert, šéfe.
  EN FS: Great salad, chef.
  cz FS: Skvělý salát, šéfe.
  EN TP: a chocolate cake dessert
  cz TP: čokoládový dort jako dezert
  EN FP: a dessert of fresh fruit
  cz FP: dezert z čerstvého ovoce
4354 | kick (noun): a blow with the foot | loc: kopnutí
  EN TS: Her kick sent leaves flying.
  cz TS: Po jejím kopnutí lítá listí.
  EN FS: Her kick sent acorns flying.
  cz FS: Po jejím kopnutí lítají žaludy.
  EN TP: a kick in the leaves
  cz TP: kopnutí do listí
  EN FP: a kick at a football
  cz FP: kopnutí do míče
4355 | adorable (adjective): lovable in a sweet, childlike way | loc: rozkošný
  EN TS: An adorable baby is kicking its feet.
  cz TS: Rozkošné miminko kope nožičkami.
  EN FS: An adorable puppy is kicking its feet.
  cz FS: Rozkošné štěně kope nožičkami.
  EN TP: an adorable smiling baby
  cz TP: rozkošné usměvavé miminko
  EN FP: an adorable sleeping kitten
  cz FP: rozkošné spící kotě
4356 | sore (adjective): painful, hurting | loc: bolavý
  EN TS: Sore back? Still a piggyback!
  cz TS: Bolavá záda? Stejně jde na koníčka!
  EN FS: Sore neck? Still a piggyback!
  cz FS: Bolavý krk? Stejně jde na koníčka!
  EN TP: rubbing a sore back
  cz TP: mnout si bolavá záda
  EN FP: a sore throat in bed
  cz FP: bolavý krk v posteli
4357 | canvas (noun): a heavy woven fabric used for sails or tents | loc: plátno
  EN TS: Her canvas rucksack could hold a sofa.
  cz TS: Její batoh z plátna by pobral i gauč.
  EN FS: Her leather rucksack could hold a sofa.
  cz FS: Její batoh z kůže by pobral i gauč.
  EN TP: a big canvas rucksack
  cz TP: velký batoh z plátna
  EN FP: a canvas for painting
  cz FP: plátno na malování
4358 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: těžký
  EN TS: That bag looks a bit heavy.
  cz TS: Ta taška bude trochu těžká.
  EN FS: That bike looks a bit heavy.
  cz FS: To kolo bude trochu těžké.
  EN TP: a heavy rucksack
  cz TP: těžký batoh
  EN FP: heavy rain
  cz FP: silný déšť
4359 | can (noun): a sealed metal container for food or drink | loc: konzerva
  EN TS: The cans are falling out.
  cz TS: Konzervy padají ven.
  EN FS: The eggs are falling out.
  cz FS: Vajíčka padají ven.
  EN TP: cans falling from a bag
  cz TP: konzervy padající z tašky
  EN FP: a can of paint
  cz FP: plechovka barvy
4360 | purse (noun): a container for carrying money and small items | loc: kabelka
  EN TS: She bought more than a purse.
  cz TS: Koupila si víc než kabelku.
  EN FS: She sold more than a purse.
  cz FS: Prodala víc než kabelku.
  EN TP: showing off a new purse
  cz TP: chlubí se novou kabelkou
  EN FP: losing her purse
  cz FP: ztrácí kabelku
4361 | shop (verb): to do your shopping | loc: nakupovat
  EN TS: She is shopping like a pro.
  cz TS: Nakupuje jak šéfová.
  EN FS: He is shopping like a pro.
  cz FS: Nakupuje jak šéf.
  EN TP: shopping with many bags
  cz TP: nakupování s hromadou tašek
  EN FP: shopping for food
  cz FP: nakupovat jídlo
4362 | belt (noun): a loop of flexible material running between wheels | loc: dopravní pás
  EN TS: A suitcase is on the belt.
  cz TS: Kufr jede na dopravním pásu.
  EN FS: A suitcase is on the bus.
  cz FS: Kufr jede v autobusu.
  EN TP: a moving luggage belt
  cz TP: pohyblivý dopravní pás
  EN FP: a leather belt
  cz FP: kožený pásek
4363 | appear (verb): to come into sight | loc: objevit se
  EN TS: His backpack finally appeared!
  cz TS: Jeho batoh se konečně objevil!
  EN FS: His suitcase finally appeared!
  cz FS: Jeho kufr se konečně objevil!
  EN TP: appearing on the belt
  cz TP: objevit se na pásu
  EN FP: appearing on television
  cz FP: objevit se v televizi
4364 | dough (noun): a flour mixture you can knead or roll | loc: těsto
  EN TS: Dough in, croissants out!
  cz TS: Těsto dovnitř, croissanty ven!
  EN FS: Dough in, pizzas out!
  cz FS: Těsto dovnitř, pizzy ven!
  EN TP: balls of raw dough
  cz TP: koule syrového těsta
  EN FP: dough for a pizza base
  cz FP: těsto na pizzu
4365 | fresh (adjective): recently made, produced or picked | loc: čerstvý
  EN TS: So much fresh bread!
  cz TS: Tolik čerstvého chleba!
  EN FS: So much fresh fish!
  cz FS: Tolik čerstvých ryb!
  EN TP: fresh bread from the oven
  cz TP: čerstvý chléb z pece
  EN FP: fresh fish from the sea
  cz FP: čerstvé ryby z moře
4366 | job (noun): the main activity you do to earn money | loc: práce
  EN TS: He loves his job.
  cz TS: Miluje svou práci.
  EN FS: He hates his job.
  cz FS: Nesnáší svou práci.
  EN TP: a job in a bakery
  cz TP: práce v pekárně
  EN FP: a job in a bank
  cz FP: práce v bance
4367 | dry (verb): to remove the moisture and make dry | loc: sušit
  EN TS: Sheets are drying in the wind.
  cz TS: Prostěradla se suší ve větru.
  EN FS: Sheets are drying on a boat.
  cz FS: Prostěradla se suší na lodi.
  EN TP: sheets drying in the wind
  cz TP: prostěradla sušící se ve větru
  EN FP: dishes drying on a rack
  cz FP: nádobí sušící se na odkapávači
4368 | light (verb): to make something lighter or brighter | loc: rozsvítit
  EN TS: She is lighting the bulbs.
  cz TS: Rozsvěcuje žárovky.
  EN FS: She is lighting the candles.
  cz FS: Rozsvěcuje svíčky.
  EN TP: lighting a string of bulbs
  cz TP: rozsvítit řetěz žárovek
  EN FP: lighting a candle
  cz FP: zapálit svíčku
4369 | tape (noun): a long thin strip of cloth or paper for fastening | loc: páska
  EN TS: Too much tape? Maybe a little.
  cz TS: Moc pásky? Možná trošku.
  EN FS: Too much glue? Maybe a little.
  cz FS: Moc lepidla? Možná trošku.
  EN TP: wrapped in white tape
  cz TP: omotaný bílou páskou
  EN FP: tape on a cardboard box
  cz FP: páska na kartonové krabici
4370 | safe (noun): a strongbox where valuables are kept | loc: trezor
  EN TS: The big safe is open.
  cz TS: Velký trezor je otevřený.
  EN FS: The big safe is closed.
  cz FS: Velký trezor je zavřený.
  EN TP: an open bank safe
  cz TP: otevřený bankovní trezor
  EN FP: a safe place to hide
  cz FP: bezpečný úkryt
4371 | lobby (noun): a large entrance or reception area | loc: vstupní hala
  EN TS: The bank lobby is huge.
  cz TS: Vstupní hala banky je obrovská.
  EN FS: The bank lobby is tiny.
  cz FS: Vstupní hala banky je maličká.
  EN TP: a marble bank lobby
  cz TP: mramorová vstupní hala banky
  EN FP: a busy hotel lobby
  cz FP: rušná hotelová hala
4373 | gather (verb): to get together, assemble | loc: sejít se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The squad gathered on a roof.
  cz TS: Parta se sešla na střeše.
  EN FS: The squad gathered on a boat.
  cz FS: Parta se sešla na lodi.
  EN TP: friends gathering on a roof
  cz TP: kámoši se scházejí na střeše
  EN FP: gathering wood for a fire
  cz FP: sbírat dřevo na oheň
4374 | electric (adjective): using or producing electricity | loc: elektrický
  EN TS: The barber uses electric clippers.
  cz TS: Holič používá elektrický strojek.
  EN FS: The barber uses an electric fan.
  cz FS: Holič používá elektrický větrák.
  EN TP: an electric hair clipper
  cz TP: elektrický strojek na vlasy
  EN FP: an electric guitar
  cz FP: elektrická kytara
4375 | rough (adjective): having an irregular, uneven surface | loc: drsný
  EN TS: The bark is rough and cracked.
  cz TS: Kůra je drsná a popraskaná.
  EN FS: The bark is smooth and clean.
  cz FS: Kůra je hladká a čistá.
  EN TP: rough tree bark
  cz TP: drsná kůra stromu
  EN FP: rough sea waves
  cz FP: drsné mořské vlny
4376 | noise (noun): sound of any kind, often unpleasant | loc: hluk
  EN TS: The smallest dog is making the biggest noise!
  cz TS: Nejmenší pes dělá největší hluk!
  EN FS: The smallest cat is making the biggest noise!
  cz FS: Nejmenší kočka dělá největší hluk!
  EN TP: a lot of noise
  cz TP: spousta hluku
  EN FP: a lot of music
  cz FP: spousta hudby
4377 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: sklep
  EN TS: The basement has a cinema!
  cz TS: Ve sklepě je kino!
  EN FS: The basement has a pool!
  cz FS: Ve sklepě je bazén!
  EN TP: a basement home cinema
  cz TP: domácí kino ve sklepě
  EN FP: a basement full of water
  cz FP: sklep plný vody
4378 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: sprcha
  EN TS: Two showers in one bathroom? Wow!
  cz TS: Dvě sprchy v jedné koupelně? Páni!
  EN FS: Two toilets in one bathroom? Wow!
  cz FS: Dva záchody v jedné koupelně? Páni!
  EN TP: a shower on the wall
  cz TP: sprcha na zdi
  EN FP: a shower in the garden
  cz FP: sprcha na zahradě
4379 | tub (noun): a large open container you fill with water to wash | loc: vana
  EN TS: The tub is foaming over!
  cz TS: Z vany přetéká pěna!
  EN FS: The sink is foaming over!
  cz FS: Z umyvadla přetéká pěna!
  EN TP: scrubbing the tub
  cz TP: drhnout vanu
  EN FP: a tub of ice cream
  cz FP: kelímek zmrzliny
4380 | fill (verb): to make something full | loc: naplnit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is filling the bath.
  cz TS: Plní vanu.
  EN FS: She is filling the sink.
  cz FS: Plní umyvadlo.
  EN TP: filling a bath with foam
  cz TP: naplnit vanu pěnou
  EN FP: filling a glass with water
  cz FP: naplnit sklenici vodou
4381 | warm (adjective): having a comfortable degree of heat | loc: teplý
  EN TS: A warm day at the beach.
  cz TS: Teplý den na pláži.
  EN FS: A cold day at the beach.
  cz FS: Studený den na pláži.
  EN TP: a warm sunny beach
  cz TP: teplá slunná pláž
  EN FP: a warm winter coat
  cz FP: teplý zimní kabát
4382 | salmon (noun): a large food fish of northern waters | loc: losos
  EN TS: The bear is grabbing a salmon.
  cz TS: Medvěd chytá lososa.
  EN FS: The bear is grabbing a bird.
  cz FS: Medvěd chytá ptáka.
  EN TP: a leaping salmon
  cz TP: vyskakující losos
  EN FP: a salmon on a plate
  cz FP: losos na talíři
4383 | thick (adjective): not thin, wide from one surface to the other | loc: tlustý | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "tlustý" wrong for a beard; used "hustý"
  EN TS: What a thick beard!
  cz TS: Jaký hustý plnovous!
  EN FS: What a thin beard!
  cz FS: Jaký řídký plnovous!
  EN TP: a thick black beard
  cz TP: hustý černý plnovous
  EN FP: a thick winter coat
  cz FP: tlustý zimní kabát
4384 | bounce (verb): to spring back after hitting something | loc: odrazit se
  EN TS: She bounced off her bed!
  cz TS: Odrazila se od postele!
  EN FS: She bounced off the sofa!
  cz FS: Odrazila se od gauče!
  EN TP: bouncing on the bed
  cz TP: odrážet se od postele
  EN FP: bouncing a ball
  cz FP: odrážet míč
4385 | cost (verb): to be priced at a certain amount | loc: stát | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The big bed costs 20,000 euros. "Cheap."
  cz TS: Velká postel stojí 20 000 eur. „Levné.“
  EN FS: The big bed costs 200 euros. "Cheap."
  cz FS: Velká postel stojí 200 eur. „Levné.“
  EN TP: costing 20,000 euros
  cz TP: stát 20 000 eur
  EN FP: costing 50 cents
  cz FP: stát 50 centů
4386 | poster (noun): a sign put up in a public place as an advert | loc: plakát
  EN TS: Posters cover his whole room.
  cz TS: Plakáty mu pokrývají celý pokoj.
  EN FS: Maps cover his whole room.
  cz FS: Mapy mu pokrývají celý pokoj.
  EN TP: walls covered in posters
  cz TP: stěny polepené plakáty
  EN FP: posters on the fridge
  cz FP: plakáty na lednici
4387 | compare (verb): to examine how things are similar or different | loc: porovnat
  EN TS: We compare three bedrooms.
  cz TS: Porovnáváme tři ložnice.
  EN FS: We compare three kitchens.
  cz FS: Porovnáváme tři kuchyně.
  EN TP: comparing three bedrooms
  cz TP: porovnání tří ložnic
  EN FP: comparing three kitchens
  cz FP: porovnání tří kuchyní
4388 | daisy (noun): a plant with flower heads of white ray petals | loc: sedmikráska
  EN TS: A bee is pollinating daisies.
  cz TS: Včela opyluje sedmikrásky.
  EN FS: A bird is pollinating daisies.
  cz FS: Pták opyluje sedmikrásky.
  EN TP: a bee over the daisies
  cz TP: včela nad sedmikráskami
  EN FP: a daisy chain necklace
  cz FP: věneček ze sedmikrásek
4389 | start (verb): to take the first step in doing something | loc: začít
  EN TS: He missed the start. Oops.
  cz TS: Ostatní začali bez něj. Ups.
  EN FS: He missed the bus. Oops.
  cz FS: Autobus odjel bez něj. Ups.
  EN TP: missing the start
  cz TP: zmeškaný start
  EN FP: starting a car
  cz FP: nastartovat auto
4390 | excitement (noun): the feeling of lively, cheerful joy | loc: vzrušení
  EN TS: The excitement is real!
  cz TS: Vzrušení level max!
  EN FS: The boredom is real!
  cz FS: Nuda level max!
  EN TP: excitement before a concert
  cz TP: vzrušení před koncertem
  EN FP: excitement before an exam
  cz FP: vzrušení před zkouškou
4391 | alone (adverb): without any others with you | loc: o samotě
  EN TS: Alone with a whole pizza? Yes!
  cz TS: O samotě s celou pizzou? Jo!
  EN FS: Alone with a whole cake? Yes!
  cz FS: O samotě s celým dortem? Jo!
  EN TP: home alone with pizza
  cz TP: doma o samotě s pizzou
  EN FP: alone in a restaurant
  cz FP: o samotě v restauraci
4392 | fall (noun): a sudden drop from standing up | loc: pád
  EN TS: What a fall in the park!
  cz TS: Tomu říkám pád v parku!
  EN FS: What a fall in the kitchen!
  cz FS: Tomu říkám pád v kuchyni!
  EN TP: a fall over a bench
  cz TP: pád přes lavičku
  EN FP: a fall from a ladder
  cz FP: pád ze žebříku
4393 | chat (verb): to talk in a friendly, relaxed way | loc: povídat si
  EN TS: The old guys are chatting.
  cz TS: Staříci si povídají.
  EN FS: The old guys are fighting.
  cz FS: Staříci se perou.
  EN TP: chatting on a bench
  cz TP: povídat si na lavičce
  EN FP: chatting on the phone
  cz FP: povídat si po telefonu
4394 | bend (verb): to form a curve | loc: ohýbat
  EN TS: She is bending everything!
  cz TS: Ohýbá úplně všechno!
  EN FS: She is breaking everything!
  cz FS: Láme úplně všechno!
  EN TP: bending a tree branch
  cz TP: ohýbat větev
  EN FP: bending a spoon
  cz FP: ohýbat lžičku
4395 | opponent (noun): a contestant you are matched against | loc: soupeř
  EN TS: She is attacking her opponent.
  cz TS: Útočí na svého soupeře.
  EN FS: She is hugging her opponent.
  cz FS: Objímá svého soupeře.
  EN TP: a sneaky opponent
  cz TP: zákeřný soupeř
  EN FP: an opponent in the ring
  cz FP: soupeř v ringu
4396 | shock (verb): to surprise someone greatly | loc: šokovat
  EN TS: Her move totally shocked him!
  cz TS: Její tah ho totálně šokoval!
  EN FS: Her move totally bored him!
  cz FS: Její tah ho totálně znudil!
  EN TP: shocked by her move
  cz TP: šokovaný jejím tahem
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  cz FP: šokovaný cenou
4397 | bike (verb): to ride a bicycle | loc: jezdit na kole
  EN TS: He is biking in Amsterdam.
  cz TS: Jezdí na kole v Amsterdamu.
  EN FS: He is biking in the forest.
  cz FS: Jezdí na kole v lese.
  EN TP: to bike along a canal
  cz TP: jezdit na kole podél kanálu
  EN FP: to bike along a beach
  cz FP: jezdit na kole podél pláže
4398 | advertisement (noun): a public promotion of a product or service | loc: reklama
  EN TS: Advertisements are everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude reklamy!
  EN FS: Trees are everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude stromy!
  EN TP: huge lit advertisements
  cz TP: obří svítící reklamy
  EN FP: advertisements in a paper
  cz FP: reklamy v novinách
4399 | dream (verb): to have a daydream or fantasy | loc: snít
  EN TS: She is dreaming of a burger.
  cz TS: Sní o burgeru.
  EN FS: She is dreaming of a pizza.
  cz FS: Sní o pizze.
  EN TP: dreaming of a big house
  cz TP: snít o velkém domě
  EN FP: dreaming at night in bed
  cz FP: snít v noci v posteli
4400 | spot (verb): to catch sight of something | loc: zahlédnout
  EN TS: She spotted birds at sea.
  cz TS: Zahlédla na moři ptáky.
  EN FS: She spotted ships at sea.
  cz FS: Zahlédla na moři lodě.
  EN TP: to spot birds far away
  cz TP: zahlédnout ptáky v dálce
  EN FP: to spot a mistake
  cz FP: zahlédnout chybu
4401 | far (adjective): at a great distance | loc: daleký
  EN TS: She is looking at the far shore.
  cz TS: Dívá se na daleký břeh.
  EN FS: She is looking at the far city.
  cz FS: Dívá se na daleké město.
  EN TP: the far lake shore
  cz TP: daleký břeh jezera
  EN FP: a far country
  cz FP: daleká země
4402 | appetite (noun): a feeling of craving food or something else | loc: chuť k jídlu
  EN TS: Apple, burger, melon: big appetite!
  cz TS: Jablko, burger, meloun: ta chuť k jídlu!
  EN FS: Apple, pizza, melon: big appetite!
  cz FS: Jablko, pizza, meloun: ta chuť k jídlu!
  EN TP: a huge picnic appetite
  cz TP: obří chuť k jídlu na pikniku
  EN FP: no appetite at all
  cz FP: žádná chuť k jídlu
4403 | layer (noun): a single thickness of some material | loc: vrstva
  EN TS: Just one more layer.
  cz TS: Už jen jednu vrstvu.
  EN FS: Just one more pillow.
  cz FS: Už jen jeden polštář.
  EN TP: layer after layer of blankets
  cz TP: vrstva za vrstvou dek
  EN FP: a layer of fresh snow
  cz FP: vrstva čerstvého sněhu
4404 | injury (noun): physical damage to the body from an accident | loc: zranění
  EN TS: He has a finger injury.
  cz TS: Má zranění prstu.
  EN FS: He has a knee injury.
  cz FS: Má zranění kolena.
  EN TP: a finger injury
  cz TP: zranění prstu
  EN FP: a sports injury
  cz FP: sportovní zranění
4405 | help (noun): the activity of doing something for someone's need | loc: pomoc
  EN TS: His friend is a big help.
  cz TS: Kamarád je pro něj velká pomoc.
  EN FS: His dog is a big help.
  cz FS: Pes je pro něj velká pomoc.
  EN TP: help from a friend
  cz TP: pomoc od kamaráda
  EN FP: help with homework
  cz FP: pomoc s úkoly
4406 | smooth (verb): to make something smooth, as if by rubbing | loc: vyhladit
  EN TS: The artist is smoothing lines.
  cz TS: Umělec vyhlazuje linie.
  EN FS: The artist is drawing lines.
  cz FS: Umělec kreslí linie.
  EN TP: smoothing harsh lines
  cz TP: vyhlazovat ostré linie
  EN FP: smoothing a bed sheet
  cz FP: vyhlazovat prostěradlo
4407 | healthy (adjective): having good health in body or mind | loc: zdravý
  EN TS: Spinach keeps him healthy.
  cz TS: Díky špenátu je zdravý.
  EN FS: Chocolate keeps him healthy.
  cz FS: Díky čokoládě je zdravý.
  EN TP: a healthy young man
  cz TP: zdravý mladý muž
  EN FP: a healthy bank account
  cz FP: zdravé bankovní konto
4408 | taste (noun): the sensation you get from food on your tongue | loc: chuť
  EN TS: Smoothie taste: perfect!
  cz TS: Chuť smoothie: dokonalá!
  EN FS: Coffee taste: perfect!
  cz FS: Chuť kafe: dokonalá!
  EN TP: the taste of a smoothie
  cz TP: chuť smoothie
  EN FP: a good taste in music
  cz FP: dobrý vkus na hudbu
4409 | blind (adjective): unable to see | loc: slepý
  EN TS: The whole party is blind!
  cz TS: Celá párty je slepá!
  EN FS: The whole party is asleep!
  cz FS: Celá párty spí!
  EN TP: blind for a party game
  cz TP: slepí při párty hře
  EN FP: a blind date
  cz FP: rande naslepo
4410 | contest (noun): an event where a winner is chosen from contestants | loc: soutěž
  EN TS: Staring contest! Don't blink!
  cz TS: Soutěž v zírání! Nemrkat!
  EN FS: Eating contest! Don't blink!
  cz FS: Soutěž v jedení! Nemrkat!
  EN TP: a staring contest
  cz TP: soutěž v zírání
  EN FP: a singing contest
  cz FP: pěvecká soutěž
4411 | treatment (noun): medical care given to help someone get better | loc: léčba
  EN TS: The treatment is a plaster.
  cz TS: Léčba je náplast.
  EN FS: The treatment is an injection.
  cz FS: Léčba je injekce.
  EN TP: treatment for a blister
  cz TP: léčba puchýře
  EN FP: treatment for a headache
  cz FP: léčba bolesti hlavy
4412 | block (verb): to make a way unsuitable for passage | loc: zablokovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Sheep are blocking the road!
  cz TS: Ovce blokují silnici!
  EN FS: Cows are blocking the road!
  cz FS: Krávy blokují silnici!
  EN TP: blocking a mountain road
  cz TP: zablokovaná horská silnice
  EN FP: blocking a phone number
  cz FP: zablokovat telefonní číslo
4413 | smell (noun): the sensation you get from odors in the nose | loc: vůně
  EN TS: She loves the smell.
  cz TS: Miluje tu vůni.
  EN FS: She hates the smell.
  cz FS: Nesnáší tu vůni.
  EN TP: the smell of blossoms
  cz TP: vůně květů
  EN FP: the smell of coffee
  cz FP: vůně kávy
4414 | struggle (noun): an energetic attempt to achieve something | loc: boj
  EN TS: Going uphill is a real struggle.
  cz TS: Jízda do kopce je pořádný boj.
  EN FS: Going downhill is a real struggle.
  cz FS: Jízda z kopce je pořádný boj.
  EN TP: a struggle against the wind
  cz TP: boj s větrem
  EN FP: a struggle with homework
  cz FP: boj s úkoly
4415 | compliment (noun): a remark expressing praise or admiration | loc: kompliment
  EN TS: Stop it! Too many compliments!
  cz TS: Přestaň! Moc komplimentů!
  EN FS: Stop it! Too many questions!
  cz FS: Přestaň! Moc otázek!
  EN TP: blushing at a compliment
  cz TP: červenat se při komplimentu
  EN FP: a compliment to the chef
  cz FP: kompliment pro kuchaře
4416 | ticket (noun): a document that lets you ride or enter somewhere | loc: lístek
  EN TS: Green light, ticket OK!
  cz TS: Zelená, lístek OK!
  EN FS: Green light, passport OK!
  cz FS: Zelená, pas OK!
  EN TP: scanning a ticket
  cz TP: skenování lístku
  EN FP: buying a train ticket
  cz FP: koupě lístku na vlak
4417 | travel (noun): the act of going from one place to another | loc: cestování
  EN TS: Travel by tram, boat, plane.
  cz TS: Cestování tramvají, lodí, letadlem.
  EN FS: Travel by bus, boat, plane.
  cz FS: Cestování autobusem, lodí, letadlem.
  EN TP: travel by boat
  cz TP: cestování lodí
  EN FP: travel by car
  cz FP: cestování autem
4418 | burst (verb): to come open suddenly from pressure inside | loc: prasknout | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "prasknout" does not fit steam bursting out; used "vystříknout"
  EN TS: Steam burst into her face.
  cz TS: Pára jí vystříkla do obličeje.
  EN FS: Water burst into her face.
  cz FS: Voda jí vystříkla do obličeje.
  EN TP: steam bursting from a pot
  cz TP: pára tryskající z hrnce
  EN FP: a burst water pipe
  cz FP: prasklá vodovodní trubka
4419 | row (verb): to move a boat with oars | loc: veslovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is rowing with her puppy.
  cz TS: Vesluje se svým štěnětem.
  EN FS: She is rowing with her kitten.
  cz FS: Vesluje se svým koťátkem.
  EN TP: rowing on a calm pond
  cz TP: veslovat na klidném rybníku
  EN FP: rowing on a wild sea
  cz FP: veslovat na rozbouřeném moři
4420 | illustration (noun): artwork that helps make something clear | loc: ilustrace
  EN TS: The illustration shows a bone.
  cz TS: Ilustrace ukazuje kost.
  EN FS: The illustration shows a hand.
  cz FS: Ilustrace ukazuje ruku.
  EN TP: an illustration of a bone
  cz TP: ilustrace kosti
  EN FP: an illustration of a hand
  cz FP: ilustrace ruky
4421 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: kost
  EN TS: She is holding a small bone.
  cz TS: Drží malou kost.
  EN FS: She is holding a small stone.
  cz FS: Drží malý kámen.
  EN TP: a long thigh bone
  cz TP: dlouhá stehenní kost
  EN FP: a dog's bone
  cz FP: psí kost
4423 | barrier (noun): a structure that blocks free movement | loc: bariéra | checker: word_missing? | translator note: a boom barrier is "závora" in Czech, "bariéra" unnatural
  EN TS: The barrier is up. Run!
  cz TS: Závora je nahoře. Utíkej!
  EN FS: The barrier is down. Run!
  cz FS: Závora je dole. Utíkej!
  EN TP: a raised barrier
  cz TP: zvednutá závora
  EN FP: a language barrier
  cz FP: jazyková bariéra
4424 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: hranice
  EN TS: The border is just a stripe.
  cz TS: Hranice je jen čára.
  EN FS: The border is just a fence.
  cz FS: Hranice je jen plot.
  EN TP: crossing the border on foot
  cz TP: přejít hranici pěšky
  EN FP: a border around a picture
  cz FP: rámeček kolem obrázku
4425 | order (verb): to direct somebody to do something with authority | loc: přikázat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The robot is ordering them around.
  cz TS: Robot jim přikazuje, co mají dělat.
  EN FS: The robot is ordering a big pizza.
  cz FS: Robot si objednává velkou pizzu.
  EN TP: to order the team around
  cz TP: přikazovat týmu
  EN FP: to order a coffee
  cz FP: objednat si kafe
4426 | meeting (noun): a formally arranged gathering | loc: porada
  EN TS: The meeting went well.
  cz TS: Porada dopadla dobře.
  EN FS: The meeting went badly.
  cz FS: Porada dopadla špatně.
  EN TP: a meeting in the office
  cz TP: porada v kanceláři
  EN FP: a meeting in the park
  cz FP: porada v parku
4427 | ceremony (noun): a formal event on a special occasion | loc: ceremonie
  EN TS: They are bowing at a ceremony.
  cz TS: Klaní se na ceremonii.
  EN FS: They are eating at a ceremony.
  cz FS: Jedí na ceremonii.
  EN TP: a formal bowing ceremony
  cz TP: formální ceremonie s úklonami
  EN FP: a wedding ceremony
  cz FP: svatební ceremonie
4429 | restaurant (noun): a building where people go to eat | loc: restaurace
  EN TS: Ramen at a noodle restaurant!
  cz TS: Ramen v nudlové restauraci!
  EN FS: Ramen at a burger restaurant!
  cz FS: Ramen v burgerové restauraci!
  EN TP: a noodle restaurant
  cz TP: nudlová restaurace
  EN FP: a restaurant kitchen
  cz FP: kuchyně restaurace
4430 | kid (noun): a young person | loc: dítě
  EN TS: The kid is so happy!
  cz TS: Dítě je tak šťastné!
  EN FS: The kid is so sad!
  cz FS: Dítě je tak smutné!
  EN TP: a kid running fast
  cz TP: rychle běžící dítě
  EN FP: a kid sitting still
  cz FP: dítě sedící v klidu
4431 | score (verb): to gain points in a game | loc: skórovat
  EN TS: He scored, the dog wants a turn.
  cz TS: Skóroval a pes chce taky na řadu.
  EN FS: He scored, the cat wants a turn.
  cz FS: Skóroval a kočka chce taky na řadu.
  EN TP: scoring a goal
  cz TP: skórovat do branky
  EN FP: scoring a basket
  cz FP: skórovat do koše
4432 | ignore (verb): to refuse to notice or acknowledge | loc: ignorovat
  EN TS: Everyone is ignoring him.
  cz TS: Všichni ho ignorují.
  EN FS: Everyone is hugging him.
  cz FS: Všichni ho objímají.
  EN TP: ignoring the salesman
  cz TP: ignorovat prodavače
  EN FP: ignoring a phone call
  cz FP: ignorovat hovor
4433 | bunch (noun): a grouping of similar things | loc: svazek | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "svazek" unnatural for flowers; used "kytice"
  EN TS: She will love this bunch.
  cz TS: Tuhle kytici bude milovat.
  EN FS: She will love this cake.
  cz FS: Tenhle dort bude milovat.
  EN TP: a bunch of roses
  cz TP: kytice růží
  EN FP: a bunch of keys
  cz FP: svazek klíčů
4434 | fair (noun): a traveling show with rides and games | loc: pouť
  EN TS: The fair is fun for two.
  cz TS: Pouť je zábava pro dva.
  EN FS: The zoo is fun for two.
  cz FS: Zoo je zábava pro dva.
  EN TP: a date at the fair
  cz TP: rande na pouti
  EN FP: a fair price
  cz FP: férová cena
4435 | exhibition (noun): a collection of things for public display | loc: výstava
  EN TS: Whoa, a brain exhibition!
  cz TS: Páni, výstava mozků!
  EN FS: Whoa, a car exhibition!
  cz FS: Páni, výstava aut!
  EN TP: a brain exhibition
  cz TP: výstava mozků
  EN FP: an art exhibition
  cz FP: výstava umění
4436 | cheer (noun): a shout of approval | loc: jásot
  EN TS: A kick like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  cz TS: Kop jako od Ronalda sklízí velký jásot!
  EN FS: A header like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  cz FS: Hlavička jako od Ronalda sklízí velký jásot!
  EN TP: a cheer for the kick
  cz TP: jásot po kopu
  EN FP: a cheer for the singer
  cz FP: jásot pro zpěváka
4438 | parade (noun): a ceremonial procession of people marching | loc: průvod
  EN TS: She is leading the parade!
  cz TS: V čele průvodu jde ona!
  EN FS: She is leading the marathon!
  cz FS: V čele maratonu jde ona!
  EN TP: a carnival parade
  cz TP: karnevalový průvod
  EN FP: a military parade
  cz FP: vojenská přehlídka
4439 | festival (noun): a day or period set aside for celebration | loc: festival
  EN TS: The festival is loud!
  cz TS: Ten festival je hlučný!
  EN FS: The festival is quiet!
  cz FS: Ten festival je tichý!
  EN TP: a street festival
  cz TP: pouliční festival
  EN FP: a film festival
  cz FP: filmový festival
4440 | strike (verb): to deliver a sharp blow with the hand or fist | loc: udeřit
  EN TS: She is striking concrete!
  cz TS: Udeří do betonu!
  EN FS: She is striking glass!
  cz FS: Udeří do skla!
  EN TP: striking a stack of slabs
  cz TP: udeřit do stohu desek
  EN FP: striking a match
  cz FP: škrtnout zápalkou
4441 | breath (noun): the process of taking in and letting out air | loc: dech
  EN TS: Wow, her breath makes clouds.
  cz TS: Páni, její dech dělá mráčky.
  EN FS: Wow, her breath makes bubbles.
  cz FS: Páni, její dech dělá bublinky.
  EN TP: a cloud of warm breath
  cz TP: obláček teplého dechu
  EN FP: a breath of fresh air
  cz FP: doušek čerstvého vzduchu
4442 | shoe (noun): footwear shaped to fit the foot | loc: bota
  EN TS: Her shoes are white.
  cz TS: Její boty jsou bílé.
  EN FS: Her shoes are red.
  cz FS: Její boty jsou červené.
  EN TP: plain white shoes
  cz TP: obyčejné bílé boty
  EN FP: white running shoes
  cz FP: bílé běžecké boty
4443 | wedding (noun): the event at which a marriage ceremony happens | loc: svatba
  EN TS: The wedding is starting and everyone is turning around.
  cz TS: Svatba začíná a všichni se otáčejí.
  EN FS: The wedding is ending and everyone is turning around.
  cz FS: Svatba končí a všichni se otáčejí.
  EN TP: walking down a wedding aisle
  cz TP: kráčet uličkou na svatbě
  EN FP: dancing at a wedding party
  cz FP: tančit na svatební oslavě
4445 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: most
  EN TS: Wow, this bridge is huge!
  cz TS: Páni, ten most je obří!
  EN FS: Wow, this boat is huge!
  cz FS: Páni, ta loď je obří!
  EN TP: a red suspension bridge
  cz TP: červený visutý most
  EN FP: a bridge over a road
  cz FP: most přes silnici
4446 | glass (noun): a hard transparent solid that breaks easily | loc: sklo
  EN TS: The pub has frosted glass.
  cz TS: Hospoda má mléčné sklo.
  EN FS: The pub has broken glass.
  cz FS: Hospoda má rozbité sklo.
  EN TP: panels of frosted glass
  cz TP: tabule mléčného skla
  EN FP: a glass of red wine
  cz FP: sklenka červeného vína
4447 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: mokrý
  EN TS: Just a little wet today.
  cz TS: Jen trochu mokrý den.
  EN FS: Just a little snowy today.
  cz FS: Jen trochu zasněžený den.
  EN TP: a wet bus stop
  cz TP: mokrá zastávka
  EN FP: a wet dog
  cz FP: mokrý pes
4448 | handle (noun): the part of an object you hold to use or move it | loc: rukojeť
  EN TS: She is gripping the handle.
  cz TS: Svírá rukojeť.
  EN FS: She is gripping the ladder.
  cz FS: Svírá žebřík.
  EN TP: a long blue handle
  cz TP: dlouhá modrá rukojeť
  EN FP: a door handle
  cz FP: klika u dveří
4450 | patch (noun): a small part that looks different from the rest | loc: záplata
  EN TS: His dungarees have patches.
  cz TS: Jeho lacláče mají záplaty.
  EN FS: His boots have patches.
  cz FS: Jeho boty mají záplaty.
  EN TP: patches on the dungarees
  cz TP: záplaty na laclácích
  EN FP: a patch of grass
  cz FP: flíček trávy
4451 | teenager (noun): a juvenile, between puberty and maturity | loc: teenager
  EN TS: Two teenagers are gaming, so intense.
  cz TS: Dva teenageři hrajou hry, hustý.
  EN FS: Two teenagers are dancing, so intense.
  cz FS: Dva teenageři tančí, hustý.
  EN TP: teenagers playing a game
  cz TP: teenageři hrající hru
  EN FP: teenagers playing football
  cz FP: teenageři hrající fotbal
4452 | hurt (verb): to be the source of pain | loc: bolet
  EN TS: That shin must really hurt!
  cz TS: Ta holeň musí fakt bolet!
  EN FS: That arm must really hurt!
  cz FS: Ta ruka musí fakt bolet!
  EN TP: a shin that hurts
  cz TP: holeň, která bolí
  EN FP: an arm that hurts
  cz FP: ruka, která bolí
4454 | tip (verb): to cause something to tilt | loc: naklonit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is tipping the apples out.
  cz TS: Naklání kbelík a vysypává jablka.
  EN FS: She is tipping the eggs out.
  cz FS: Naklání kbelík a vysypává vajíčka.
  EN TP: tipping a bucket of apples
  cz TP: naklonit kbelík jablek
  EN FP: tipping the waiter
  cz FP: dát spropitné číšníkovi
4455 | site (noun): the piece of land where something is located | loc: pozemek
  EN TS: He is working on the site.
  cz TS: Pracuje na pozemku.
  EN FS: He is sleeping on the site.
  cz FS: Spí na pozemku.
  EN TP: a building site
  cz TP: stavební pozemek
  EN FP: a camping site
  cz FP: místo v kempu
4456 | modern (adjective): belonging to the present, modern era | loc: moderní
  EN TS: The tower is very modern.
  cz TS: Věž je velmi moderní.
  EN FS: The tower is very old.
  cz FS: Věž je velmi stará.
  EN TP: a modern glass tower
  cz TP: moderní skleněná věž
  EN FP: a modern glass phone
  cz FP: moderní skleněný telefon
4457 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: dřepnout si | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is crouching by the fire.
  cz TS: Dřepí u ohně.
  EN FS: She is crouching by the car.
  cz FS: Dřepí u auta.
  EN TP: crouching over a fire
  cz TP: dřepnout si nad ohněm
  EN FP: crouching behind a rock
  cz FP: dřepnout si za skálu
4458 | disaster (noun): a state of extreme ruin and misfortune | loc: katastrofa
  EN TS: Total kitchen disaster!
  cz TS: Totální katastrofa v kuchyni!
  EN FS: Total garden disaster!
  cz FS: Totální katastrofa na zahradě!
  EN TP: a smoky kitchen disaster
  cz TP: zakouřená katastrofa v kuchyni
  EN FP: a natural disaster on TV
  cz FP: přírodní katastrofa v televizi
4459 | burning (noun): the act of burning something | loc: pálení
  EN TS: A little burning, no problem.
  cz TS: Trošku pálení, žádný problém.
  EN FS: A little rain, no problem.
  cz FS: Trošku deště, žádný problém.
  EN TP: the burning of a marshmallow
  cz TP: pálení marshmallow
  EN FP: the burning of old letters
  cz FP: pálení starých dopisů
4460 | palm (noun): the inner surface of the hand | loc: dlaň
  EN TS: She is warming her palms.
  cz TS: Ohřívá si dlaně.
  EN FS: She is warming her feet.
  cz FS: Ohřívá si nohy.
  EN TP: palms out to the fire
  cz TP: dlaně natažené k ohni
  EN FP: palm trees on the beach
  cz FP: palmy na pláži
4461 | dig (verb): to turn up or remove earth | loc: kopat
  EN TS: They are digging. He can't escape.
  cz TS: Kopou. Nemůže utéct.
  EN FS: They are swimming. He can't escape.
  cz FS: Plavou. Nemůže utéct.
  EN TP: digging in the sand
  cz TP: kopat v písku
  EN FP: digging in the garden
  cz FP: kopat na zahradě
4462 | funeral (noun): a ceremony where a dead person is buried | loc: pohřeb
  EN TS: A white rose at the funeral.
  cz TS: Bílá růže na pohřbu.
  EN FS: A red rose at the funeral.
  cz FS: Rudá růže na pohřbu.
  EN TP: a funeral in a cemetery
  cz TP: pohřeb na hřbitově
  EN FP: a funeral in a church
  cz FP: pohřeb v kostele
4463 | welcome (verb): to greet someone on arrival | loc: přivítat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The driver is welcoming them.
  cz TS: Řidič je vítá.
  EN FS: The pilot is welcoming them.
  cz FS: Pilot je vítá.
  EN TP: welcoming people on a bus
  cz TP: vítat lidi v autobusu
  EN FP: welcoming people on a plane
  cz FP: vítat lidi v letadle
4464 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: číst | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading, not waiting.
  cz TS: Ona čte, nečeká.
  EN FS: She is eating, not waiting.
  cz FS: Ona jí, nečeká.
  EN TP: reading at a bus stop
  cz TP: čtení na zastávce
  EN FP: reading on the train
  cz FP: čtení ve vlaku
4465 | upstairs (adverb): on a floor above | loc: nahoře
  EN TS: He went upstairs, best day ever!
  cz TS: Sedí nahoře, nejlepší den vůbec!
  EN FS: He went downstairs, best day ever!
  cz FS: Sedí dole, nejlepší den vůbec!
  EN TP: upstairs on a bus
  cz TP: nahoře v autobusu
  EN FP: upstairs in a house
  cz FP: nahoře v domě
4466 | aboard (adverb): on a ship, train, plane or other vehicle | loc: na palubě
  EN TS: All aboard the tour bus!
  cz TS: Všichni na palubu vyhlídkového busu!
  EN FS: All aboard the ferry!
  cz FS: Všichni na palubu trajektu!
  EN TP: aboard a city bus
  cz TP: na palubě městského autobusu
  EN FP: aboard a cruise ship
  cz FP: na palubě výletní lodi
4467 | ham (noun): meat from the thigh of a pig, usually smoked | loc: šunka
  EN TS: Hams are hanging on the wall.
  cz TS: Na zdi visí šunky.
  EN FS: Hats are hanging on the wall.
  cz FS: Na zdi visí klobouky.
  EN TP: whole hams on hooks
  cz TP: celé šunky na hácích
  EN FP: a ham sandwich
  cz FP: sendvič se šunkou
4468 | porter (noun): a person employed to carry luggage | loc: nosič
  EN TS: The porter is carrying a lot.
  cz TS: Nosič toho nese docela dost.
  EN FS: The porter is holding nothing.
  cz FS: Nosič nenese vůbec nic.
  EN TP: a heavily loaded porter
  cz TP: těžce naložený nosič
  EN FP: a porter at a hotel
  cz FP: nosič v hotelu
4469 | cabinet (noun): a piece of furniture with doors and shelves | loc: skříňka
  EN TS: The cabinet is attacking him!
  cz TS: Skříňka na něj útočí!
  EN FS: The fridge is attacking him!
  cz FS: Lednice na něj útočí!
  EN TP: opening the kitchen cabinet
  cz TP: otevírat kuchyňskou skříňku
  EN FP: locking the kitchen cabinet
  cz FP: zamykat kuchyňskou skříňku
4470 | store (verb): to keep something for future use | loc: uskladnit
  EN TS: Plates stored in colour order.
  cz TS: Talíře uskladněné podle barev.
  EN FS: Cups stored in colour order.
  cz FS: Hrnky uskladněné podle barev.
  EN TP: storing plates in a cupboard
  cz TP: uskladnit talíře ve skříni
  EN FP: storing files on a laptop
  cz FP: ukládat soubory na notebook
4471 | height (noun): how tall something is, its vertical size | loc: výška
  EN TS: The pylon has a scary height!
  cz TS: Ten stožár má děsivou výšku!
  EN FS: The bridge has a scary height!
  cz FS: Ten most má děsivou výšku!
  EN TP: the pylon's great height
  cz TP: velká výška stožáru
  EN FP: the height of a bridge
  cz FP: výška mostu
4472 | altitude (noun): height above sea level | loc: nadmořská výška
  EN TS: He can't believe the altitude!
  cz TS: Nemůže uvěřit té nadmořské výšce!
  EN FS: He can't believe the heat!
  cz FS: Nemůže uvěřit tomu horku!
  EN TP: a cable car at altitude
  cz TP: lanovka ve velké nadmořské výšce
  EN FP: the altitude of a plane
  cz FP: letová výška letadla
4473 | yell (verb): to give a sudden loud cry | loc: vykřiknout
  EN TS: The cactus made him yell!
  cz TS: Kvůli kaktusu vykřikl!
  EN FS: The snake made him yell!
  cz FS: Kvůli hadovi vykřikl!
  EN TP: yelling in the desert
  cz TP: vykřiknout v poušti
  EN FP: yelling in the snow
  cz FP: vykřiknout ve sněhu
4474 | menu (noun): a list of dishes available at a restaurant | loc: jídelní lístek
  EN TS: The menu is on the wall.
  cz TS: Jídelní lístek je na zdi.
  EN FS: The menu is on the table.
  cz FS: Jídelní lístek je na stole.
  EN TP: a coffee menu on boards
  cz TP: jídelní lístek na tabulích
  EN FP: a menu on a phone
  cz FP: jídelní lístek v mobilu
4475 | display (verb): to show something, make it visible | loc: vystavit
  EN TS: Cups are displayed on shelves.
  cz TS: Hrnky jsou vystavené na policích.
  EN FS: Jars are displayed on shelves.
  cz FS: Sklenice jsou vystavené na policích.
  EN TP: cups displayed on shelves
  cz TP: hrnky vystavené na policích
  EN FP: displaying a price list
  cz FP: vystavit ceník
4476 | hall (noun): a large entrance or reception room | loc: hala
  EN TS: What a huge cafe hall!
  cz TS: Ta kavárna má obří halu!
  EN FS: What a tiny cafe hall!
  cz FS: Ta kavárna má malinkou halu!
  EN TP: a huge ornate hall
  cz TP: obří zdobená hala
  EN FP: a school sports hall
  cz FP: školní sportovní hala
4477 | month (noun): one of the twelve parts of the year | loc: měsíc
  EN TS: He is turning to a new month.
  cz TS: Otáčí list na nový měsíc.
  EN FS: He is turning to a new book.
  cz FS: Otáčí list v nové knize.
  EN TP: turning to a new month
  cz TP: otočit na nový měsíc
  EN FP: a month at the beach
  cz FP: měsíc na pláži
4478 | date (noun): the specified day of the month | loc: datum
  EN TS: She marked a date. Big day!
  cz TS: Zakroužkovala datum. Velký den!
  EN FS: She marked a name. Big day!
  cz FS: Zakroužkovala jméno. Velký den!
  EN TP: a date marked in red
  cz TP: datum označené červeně
  EN FP: a date at a restaurant
  cz FP: rande v restauraci
4479 | hard (adjective): not easy, needing great effort | loc: těžký
  EN TS: This ride is hard work!
  cz TS: Tahle jízda je těžká makačka!
  EN FS: This ride is easy work!
  cz FS: Tahle jízda je lehká makačka!
  EN TP: a hard spin class
  cz TP: těžká hodina spinningu
  EN FP: a hard bike seat
  cz FP: tvrdé sedlo na kole
4480 | curve (noun): a line that bends, changing direction | loc: křivka
  EN TS: The dune makes a long curve.
  cz TS: Duna tvoří dlouhou křivku.
  EN FS: The river makes a long curve.
  cz FS: Řeka tvoří dlouhou křivku.
  EN TP: the curve of a dune
  cz TP: křivka duny
  EN FP: a curve in the road
  cz FP: zatáčka na silnici
4481 | focus (verb): to bring something to a central point | loc: zaostřit
  EN TS: She is focusing like a pro.
  cz TS: Zaostřuje jak profík.
  EN FS: She is cooking like a pro.
  cz FS: Vaří jak profík.
  EN TP: to focus the lens
  cz TP: zaostřit objektiv
  EN FP: to focus on homework
  cz FP: soustředit se na úkoly
4482 | shoot (verb): to make a film or photograph of something | loc: fotit
  EN TS: She is shooting the rooftops.
  cz TS: Fotí střechy.
  EN FS: She is shooting the beach.
  cz FS: Fotí pláž.
  EN TP: shooting photos in the city
  cz TP: fotit ve městě
  EN FP: shooting at a target
  cz FP: střílet na terč
4483 | log (noun): a piece of a tree trunk with the branches cut off | loc: kláda
  EN TS: The cabin is made of logs.
  cz TS: Chata je z klád.
  EN FS: The cabin is made of bricks.
  cz FS: Chata je z cihel.
  EN TP: a cabin of stacked logs
  cz TP: chata z naskládaných klád
  EN FP: a log on the ice
  cz FP: kláda na ledu
4484 | dawn (noun): the first light of day | loc: úsvit
  EN TS: Dawn lights up the peaks first.
  cz TS: Úsvit osvětlí vrcholky jako první.
  EN FS: Dawn lights up the trees first.
  cz FS: Úsvit osvětlí stromy jako první.
  EN TP: the first light of dawn
  cz TP: první světlo úsvitu
  EN FP: dawn in a busy city
  cz FP: úsvit v rušném městě
4485 | powerful (adjective): having great power or force | loc: silný
  EN TS: Powerful falls, free shower!
  cz TS: Silný vodopád, sprcha zdarma!
  EN FS: Powerful rain, free shower!
  cz FS: Silný déšť, sprcha zdarma!
  EN TP: a powerful waterfall
  cz TP: silný vodopád
  EN FP: a powerful canoe engine
  cz FP: silný motor kánoe
4487 | kind (adjective): having a considerate and helpful nature | loc: laskavý
  EN TS: What a kind guy!
  cz TS: Jaký laskavý kluk!
  EN FS: What a lazy guy!
  cz FS: Jaký líný kluk!
  EN TP: a kind young man
  cz TP: laskavý mladík
  EN FP: a kind of pancake
  cz FP: druh palačinky
4488 | document (noun): an official piece of writing with information | loc: dokument
  EN TS: Every document gets a red X. Bad day at the office.
  cz TS: Každý dokument dostane červený křížek. Blbý den v kanclu.
  EN FS: Every document gets a green tick. Bad day at the office.
  cz FS: Každý dokument dostane zelenou fajfku. Blbý den v kanclu.
  EN TP: stamping a document
  cz TP: razítkovat dokument
  EN FP: printing a document
  cz FP: tisknout dokument
4489 | wax (noun): a soft substance from plant, animal or mineral | loc: vosk
  EN TS: Melted wax is everywhere.
  cz TS: Všude je rozteklý vosk.
  EN FS: Melted butter is everywhere.
  cz FS: Všude je rozteklé máslo.
  EN TP: melted candle wax
  cz TP: rozteklý vosk ze svíčky
  EN FP: a wax figure
  cz FP: vosková figurína
4490 | prepare (verb): to make ready in advance | loc: připravit
  EN TS: She is preparing the table.
  cz TS: Připravuje stůl.
  EN FS: She is cleaning the table.
  cz FS: Uklízí stůl.
  EN TP: preparing a dinner table
  cz TP: připravit stůl na večeři
  EN FP: preparing for a test
  cz FP: připravit se na test
4491 | below (adverb): in or to a lower place | loc: níže
  EN TS: The river is far below.
  cz TS: Řeka je daleko níže.
  EN FS: The sun is far below.
  cz FS: Slunce je daleko níže.
  EN TP: a river far below
  cz TP: řeka daleko níže
  EN FP: clouds far below
  cz FP: mraky daleko níže
4492 | impressive (adjective): making a strong impression | loc: působivý
  EN TS: The golden dome is impressive.
  cz TS: Zlatá kupole je působivá.
  EN FS: The silver dome is impressive.
  cz FS: Stříbrná kupole je působivá.
  EN TP: an impressive golden dome
  cz TP: působivá zlatá kupole
  EN FP: an impressive exam result
  cz FP: působivý výsledek zkoušky
4493 | struggle (verb): to make a strenuous effort | loc: zápasit
  EN TS: He is struggling at the wheel.
  cz TS: Za volantem zápasí!
  EN FS: He is sleeping at the wheel.
  cz FS: Za volantem spí!
  EN TP: struggling with the wheel
  cz TP: zápasit s volantem
  EN FP: struggling with a heavy bag
  cz FP: zápasit s těžkou taškou
4495 | cost (noun): the total spent for goods or services | loc: náklady
  EN TS: The cost of the old car is 500 euros.
  cz TS: Náklady na staré auto jsou 500 eur.
  EN FS: The cost of the old car is 5,000 euros.
  cz FS: Náklady na staré auto jsou 5 000 eur.
  EN TP: the cost of a car
  cz TP: náklady na auto
  EN FP: the cost of a flat
  cz FP: náklady na byt
4496 | lay (verb): to put something in a certain place | loc: položit
  EN TS: He laid the rug on the floor.
  cz TS: Položil koberec na podlahu.
  EN FS: He laid the rug on the bed.
  cz FS: Položil koberec na postel.
  EN TP: to lay a rug down
  cz TP: položit koberec
  EN FP: to lay the table
  cz FP: prostřít stůl
4497 | hand (verb): to place something into someone's hands | loc: podat
  EN TS: He is handing over a coin.
  cz TS: Podává minci.
  EN FS: He is handing over a key.
  cz FS: Podává klíč.
  EN TP: handing over the change
  cz TP: podávat drobné
  EN FP: handing over a gift
  cz FP: podávat dárek
4498 | sign (verb): to mark with your signature | loc: podepsat
  EN TS: Friends are signing his cast.
  cz TS: Kamarádi mu podepisují sádru.
  EN FS: Friends are signing his shirt.
  cz FS: Kamarádi mu podepisují tričko.
  EN TP: signing a plaster cast
  cz TP: podepsat sádru
  EN FP: signing a contract
  cz FP: podepsat smlouvu
4499 | visit (verb): to go to see a place | loc: navštívit
  EN TS: Castles: he visits them all.
  cz TS: Hrady? Navštíví je všechny.
  EN FS: Farms: he visits them all.
  cz FS: Farmy? Navštíví je všechny.
  EN TP: visiting old castles
  cz TP: navštěvovat staré hrady
  EN FP: visiting old friends
  cz FP: navštěvovat staré kámoše
4500 | quick (adjective): done rapidly, without delay | loc: rychlý
  EN TS: Quick hands save the day.
  cz TS: Rychlé ruce zachraňují situaci.
  EN FS: Quick dogs save the day.
  cz FS: Rychlí psi zachraňují situaci.
  EN TP: a quick catch
  cz TP: rychlý chyták
  EN FP: a quick nap
  cz FP: rychlý šlofík
4501 | insect (noun): a small air-breathing creature with six legs | loc: hmyz
  EN TS: This insect had a snack.
  cz TS: Tenhle hmyz si dal svačinu.
  EN FS: This bird had a snack.
  cz FS: Tenhle pták si dal svačinu.
  EN TP: an insect on a leaf
  cz TP: hmyz na listu
  EN FP: an insect on a flower
  cz FP: hmyz na květu
4502 | ceiling (noun): the upper surface of a room, overhead | loc: strop
  EN TS: Ceilings are so interesting.
  cz TS: Stropy jsou tak zajímavé.
  EN FS: Floors are so interesting.
  cz FS: Podlahy jsou tak zajímavé.
  EN TP: looking up at the ceiling
  cz TP: koukat na strop
  EN FP: painting the ceiling
  cz FP: malovat strop
4503 | wish (verb): to hope for something | loc: přát si | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is making a wish.
  cz TS: Právě si něco přeje.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  cz FS: Právě peče dort.
  EN TP: making a birthday wish
  cz TP: přát si něco k narozeninám
  EN FP: wishing for rain
  cz FP: přát si déšť
4504 | success (noun): an event that achieves its intended purpose | loc: úspěch
  EN TS: What a success!
  cz TS: To je ale úspěch!
  EN FS: What a failure!
  cz FS: To je ale fiasko!
  EN TP: celebrating a big success
  cz TP: oslava velkého úspěchu
  EN FP: a success on stage
  cz FP: úspěch na pódiu
4505 | backwards (adverb): toward the back or rear | loc: dozadu
  EN TS: He is falling over backwards!
  cz TS: Padá dozadu!
  EN FS: He is falling over forwards!
  cz FS: Padá dopředu!
  EN TP: falling backwards off a chair
  cz TP: padat dozadu ze židle
  EN FP: walking backwards to the table
  cz FP: jít dozadu ke stolu
4506 | comfort (noun): a relaxed state with no pain | loc: pohodlí
  EN TS: Comfort? The green chair wins.
  cz TS: Pohodlí? Vyhrává zelené křeslo.
  EN FS: Comfort? The white chair wins.
  cz FS: Pohodlí? Vyhrává bílé křeslo.
  EN TP: comfort in a big armchair
  cz TP: pohodlí ve velkém křesle
  EN FP: comfort on a kitchen chair
  cz FP: pohodlí na kuchyňské židli
4507 | tag (noun): a label attached to something, showing its owner | loc: visačka
  EN TS: The agent is attaching a tag.
  cz TS: Pracovník připevňuje visačku.
  EN FS: The agent is attaching a lock.
  cz FS: Pracovník připevňuje zámek.
  EN TP: a tag on a suitcase
  cz TP: visačka na kufru
  EN FP: a jacket name tag
  cz FP: jmenovka na bundě
4508 | load (verb): to fill or place a load on something | loc: naložit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's loading bags like a boss.
  cz TS: Nakládá tašky jak šéf.
  EN FS: He's loading food like a boss.
  cz FS: Nakládá jídlo jak šéf.
  EN TP: loading bags onto the belt
  cz TP: nakládat tašky na pás
  EN FP: loading a truck with boxes
  cz FP: nakládat krabice na náklaďák
4509 | weigh (verb): to have a certain weight | loc: vážit
  EN TS: The bag weighs 12.95 kg. Accepted.
  cz TS: Taška váží 12,95 kg. Přijato.
  EN FS: The bag weighs 21.95 kg. Accepted.
  cz FS: Taška váží 21,95 kg. Přijato.
  EN TP: weighing a bag
  cz TP: vážení tašky
  EN FP: weighing the fruit
  cz FP: vážení ovoce
4510 | check (verb): to examine something to see if it is right | loc: zkontrolovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is checking her ticket. Wrong gate?
  cz TS: Kontroluje si letenku. Špatný gate?
  EN FS: She is checking her phone. Wrong gate?
  cz FS: Kontroluje si telefon. Špatný gate?
  EN TP: checking the flight board
  cz TP: zkontrolovat letovou tabuli
  EN FP: checking her bag
  cz FP: zkontrolovat si tašku
4511 | service (noun): work done by one person that benefits another | loc: služba
  EN TS: The service here is excellent.
  cz TS: Služby jsou tu výborné.
  EN FS: The service here is rude.
  cz FS: Služby jsou tu otřesné.
  EN TP: friendly service at a desk
  cz TP: přátelská služba na přepážce
  EN FP: room service in a hotel
  cz FP: pokojová služba v hotelu
4512 | list (noun): an ordered set of names or items | loc: seznam
  EN TS: He is checking his list.
  cz TS: Kontroluje svůj seznam.
  EN FS: He is checking his phone.
  cz FS: Kontroluje svůj telefon.
  EN TP: ticking off a list
  cz TP: odškrtávat seznam
  EN FP: writing a shopping list
  cz FP: psát nákupní seznam
4513 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: kufr
  EN TS: All good: suitcase and ticket.
  cz TS: Všechno OK: kufr i letenka.
  EN FS: All good: backpack and ticket.
  cz FS: Všechno OK: batoh i letenka.
  EN TP: a suitcase at the airport
  cz TP: kufr na letišti
  EN FP: a suitcase on a train
  cz FP: kufr ve vlaku
4514 | skill (noun): an ability you gain by training | loc: dovednost
  EN TS: The chef has crazy skills.
  cz TS: Ten kuchař má šílené dovednosti.
  EN FS: The waiter has crazy skills.
  cz FS: Ten číšník má šílené dovednosti.
  EN TP: a chef's cooking skill
  cz TP: kuchařská dovednost
  EN FP: a juggling skill
  cz FP: žonglérská dovednost
4515 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: vyhrát
  EN TS: He won a medal. You bet!
  cz TS: Vyhrál medaili. No jasně!
  EN FS: He won a cup. You bet!
  cz FS: Vyhrál pohár. No jasně!
  EN TP: to win a medal
  cz TP: vyhrát medaili
  EN FP: to win a car
  cz FP: vyhrát auto
4516 | hay (noun): dried grass used as food for animals | loc: seno
  EN TS: The barn floor is full of hay.
  cz TS: Podlaha stodoly je plná sena.
  EN FS: The barn floor is full of mud.
  cz FS: Podlaha stodoly je plná bláta.
  EN TP: a nest made of hay
  cz TP: hnízdo ze sena
  EN FP: hay bales on a truck
  cz FP: balíky sena na náklaďáku
4517 | pull (noun): the act of pulling something toward you | loc: zatažení | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is giving the rope a pull.
  cz TS: Zatahá za lano.
  EN FS: He is giving the rope a cut.
  cz FS: Přestřihne lano.
  EN TP: a pull on the rope
  cz TP: zatažení za lano
  EN FP: the pull of the moon
  cz FP: přitažlivost Měsíce
4519 | ash (noun): what remains when something is burned | loc: popel
  EN TS: He's stacking logs on the ash.
  cz TS: Skládá polena na popel.
  EN FS: He's stacking logs on the rug.
  cz FS: Skládá polena na koberec.
  EN TP: a thick bed of ash
  cz TP: silná vrstva popela
  EN FP: an old ash tree
  cz FP: starý jasan
4520 | stretch (verb): to spread over a large, long area | loc: táhnout se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The wall stretches forever.
  cz TS: Zeď se táhne donekonečna.
  EN FS: The river stretches forever.
  cz FS: Řeka se táhne donekonečna.
  EN TP: stretching over the mountains
  cz TP: táhnout se přes hory
  EN FP: stretching before a run
  cz FP: protahovat se před během
4521 | distance (noun): a far away region | loc: dálka
  EN TS: Towers fade in the distance.
  cz TS: Věže mizí v dálce.
  EN FS: Houses fade in the distance.
  cz FS: Domy mizí v dálce.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  cz TP: věže v dálce
  EN FP: a long-distance phone call
  cz FP: dálkový hovor
4522 | tour (noun): a journey all the way around a place | loc: okružní cesta
  EN TS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and dumplings!
  cz TS: Její okružní cesta: zeď, loď a knedlíčky!
  EN FS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and pizza!
  cz FS: Její okružní cesta: zeď, loď a pizza!
  EN TP: a tour of China
  cz TP: okružní cesta po Číně
  EN FP: a tour of Italy
  cz FP: okružní cesta po Itálii
4524 | fold (verb): to bend so that one part covers the other | loc: přehnout
  EN TS: Perfectly folded dumplings.
  cz TS: Dokonale přehnuté knedlíčky.
  EN FS: Perfectly folded napkins.
  cz FS: Dokonale přehnuté ubrousky.
  EN TP: folding dumpling edges
  cz TP: přehýbání okrajů knedlíčků
  EN FP: folding clean laundry
  cz FP: skládání čistého prádla
4525 | help (verb): to give help or assistance to someone | loc: pomoct
  EN TS: She helped him breathe again.
  cz TS: Pomohla mu znovu dýchat.
  EN FS: She helped him stand up again.
  cz FS: Pomohla mu znovu vstát.
  EN TP: helping a choking man
  cz TP: pomoct dusícímu se muži
  EN FP: helping with the dishes
  cz FP: pomoct s nádobím
4526 | election (noun): a vote to choose a winner for a position | loc: volby
  EN TS: She is thinking very hard about this election.
  cz TS: Ona o těch volbách fakt usilovně přemýšlí.
  EN FS: He is thinking very hard about this election.
  cz FS: On o těch volbách fakt usilovně přemýšlí.
  EN TP: voting in an election
  cz TP: hlasovat ve volbách
  EN FP: winning an election
  cz FP: vyhrát volby
4527 | vegetable (noun): a plant part you eat, like roots, leaves or stems | loc: zelenina
  EN TS: He is chopping vegetables!
  cz TS: Krájí zeleninu!
  EN FS: He is chopping meat!
  cz FS: Krájí maso!
  EN TP: chopping vegetables
  cz TP: krájení zeleniny
  EN FP: washing vegetables
  cz FP: mytí zeleniny
4528 | grave (noun): a place in the ground where a dead body is buried | loc: hrob
  EN TS: Old graves surround the church.
  cz TS: Kostel obklopují staré hroby.
  EN FS: Old graves surround the castle.
  cz FS: Hrad obklopují staré hroby.
  EN TP: graves around a church
  cz TP: hroby kolem kostela
  EN FP: graves on a battlefield
  cz FP: hroby na bojišti
4529 | color (noun): what things look like from the light they reflect | loc: barva
  EN TS: Floor full of color. Magic!
  cz TS: Podlaha plná barev. Kouzlo!
  EN FS: Floor full of water. Magic!
  cz FS: Podlaha plná vody. Kouzlo!
  EN TP: colors on a stone floor
  cz TP: barvy na kamenné podlaze
  EN FP: colors on a painted wall
  cz FP: barvy na malované zdi
4530 | film (noun): a story told with moving pictures and sound | loc: film
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying at the film!
  cz TS: Při filmu lítá popcorn!
  EN FS: Drinks are flying at the film!
  cz FS: Při filmu lítá pití!
  EN TP: watching a film
  cz TP: dívat se na film
  EN FP: making a film
  cz FP: natáčet film
4531 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: popcorn
  EN TS: She is ready with her popcorn.
  cz TS: Je připravená s popcornem.
  EN FS: She is ready with her pizza.
  cz FS: Je připravená s pizzou.
  EN TP: a big tub of popcorn
  cz TP: velký kbelík popcornu
  EN FP: making popcorn at home
  cz FP: dělat popcorn doma
4532 | trash (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: odpadky
  EN TS: Park duty: picking up trash.
  cz TS: Služba v parku: sbírání odpadků.
  EN FS: Park duty: picking up flowers.
  cz FS: Služba v parku: sbírání květin.
  EN TP: picking up park trash
  cz TP: sbírat odpadky v parku
  EN FP: a full trash can
  cz FP: plný koš na odpadky
4533 | court (noun): a room in which a law court sits | loc: soudní síň
  EN TS: They are celebrating in court.
  cz TS: Slaví v soudní síni.
  EN FS: They are crying in court.
  cz FS: Pláčou v soudní síni.
  EN TP: a happy family in court
  cz TP: šťastná rodina v soudní síni
  EN FP: a tennis court party
  cz FP: párty na tenisovém kurtu
4534 | official (noun): a worker who holds an office | loc: úředník
  EN TS: The official wears a chain.
  cz TS: Úředník nosí řetěz.
  EN FS: The official wears a crown.
  cz FS: Úředník nosí korunu.
  EN TP: an official with a chain
  cz TP: úředník s řetězem
  EN FP: an official stamping passports
  cz FP: úředník razítkující pasy
4535 | lesson (noun): a unit of instruction | loc: vyučovací hodina
  EN TS: He is throwing paper during the lesson!
  cz TS: Během vyučovací hodiny hází papírky!
  EN FS: He is throwing chalk during the lesson!
  cz FS: Během vyučovací hodiny hází křídu!
  EN TP: a math lesson
  cz TP: vyučovací hodina matiky
  EN FP: a swimming lesson
  cz FP: hodina plavání
4536 | craft (noun): the skilled practice of a practical job | loc: řemeslo
  EN TS: The craft here is pottery.
  cz TS: Řemeslo tady: hrnčířství.
  EN FS: The craft here is painting.
  cz FS: Řemeslo tady: malování.
  EN TP: the craft of pottery
  cz TP: hrnčířské řemeslo
  EN FP: the craft of glassmaking
  cz FP: sklářské řemeslo
4537 | clear (verb): to rid a place of obstructions | loc: vyklidit
  EN TS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she collapsed.
  cz TS: Vyklidila celý byt. Pak se zhroutila.
  EN FS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she danced.
  cz FS: Vyklidila celý byt. Pak se roztančila.
  EN TP: clearing the shelves
  cz TP: vyklízet police
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  cz FP: odkašlat si
4538 | rest (noun): freedom from work or activity | loc: odpočinek
  EN TS: Task done. Time for a rest.
  cz TS: Úkol hotový. Čas na odpočinek.
  EN FS: Task done. Time for a run.
  cz FS: Úkol hotový. Čas na běh.
  EN TP: a rest on the sofa
  cz TP: odpočinek na gauči
  EN FP: a highway rest stop
  cz FP: odpočívadlo u dálnice
4539 | cartoon (noun): a humorous drawing in a newspaper | loc: kreslený vtip
  EN TS: The cartoon man is mopping.
  cz TS: Panáček z kresleného vtipu vytírá.
  EN FS: The cartoon man is cooking.
  cz FS: Panáček z kresleného vtipu vaří.
  EN TP: a cartoon of a cleaner
  cz TP: kreslený vtip o uklízeči
  EN FP: a cartoon of a cook
  cz FP: kreslený vtip o kuchaři
4540 | equipment (noun): the things needed to do a job or service | loc: vybavení
  EN TS: Proper safety equipment.
  cz TS: Pořádné bezpečnostní vybavení.
  EN FS: Proper diving equipment.
  cz FS: Pořádné potápěčské vybavení.
  EN TP: window-cleaning equipment
  cz TP: vybavení na mytí oken
  EN FP: gym equipment in a hall
  cz FP: posilovací vybavení v hale
4541 | filthy (adjective): disgustingly dirty | loc: zasviněný
  EN TS: The sink was filthy with hair!
  cz TS: Umyvadlo bylo zasviněné vlasy!
  EN FS: The sink was filthy with mud!
  cz FS: Umyvadlo bylo zasviněné blátem!
  EN TP: a filthy hairy basin
  cz TP: zasviněné umyvadlo plné vlasů
  EN FP: filthy boots by the door
  cz FP: zasviněné boty u dveří
4542 | agreement (noun): a statement of promises exchanged | loc: dohoda
  EN TS: They reached an agreement.
  cz TS: Došli k dohodě.
  EN FS: They reached the airport.
  cz FS: Došli k letišti.
  EN TP: shaking hands on an agreement
  cz TP: stvrdit dohodu podáním ruky
  EN FP: a rental agreement
  cz FP: dohoda o nájmu
4543 | risk (noun): a source of danger, a chance of loss | loc: riziko
  EN TS: That thin rope is a tiny risk.
  cz TS: Tohle tenké lano je jen malinké riziko.
  EN FS: That ladder is a tiny risk.
  cz FS: Tenhle žebřík je jen malinké riziko.
  EN TP: risk on a sea cliff
  cz TP: riziko na mořském útesu
  EN FP: risk in a casino
  cz FP: riziko v kasinu
4544 | contrast (noun): the difference between things that are compared | loc: protiklad
  EN TS: Sand and ice. Small contrast.
  cz TS: Písek a led. Malý protiklad.
  EN FS: Sea and ice. Small contrast.
  cz FS: Moře a led. Malý protiklad.
  EN TP: sand and ice in contrast
  cz TP: písek a led jako protiklad
  EN FP: day and night in contrast
  cz FP: den a noc jako protiklad
4545 | strength (noun): being physically or mentally strong | loc: síla
  EN TS: She has huge finger strength.
  cz TS: Ona má obrovskou sílu v prstech.
  EN FS: He has huge finger strength.
  cz FS: On má obrovskou sílu v prstech.
  EN TP: strength in her fingers
  cz TP: síla v jejích prstech
  EN FP: strength in her legs
  cz FP: síla v jejích nohách
4546 | surgery (noun): a room where you see a doctor or dentist | loc: ordinace
  EN TS: The surgery has a green couch.
  cz TS: Ordinace má zelené lehátko.
  EN FS: The surgery has a red couch.
  cz FS: Ordinace má červené lehátko.
  EN TP: a boy in the surgery
  cz TP: kluk v ordinaci
  EN FP: a boy having surgery
  cz FP: kluk na operaci
4547 | waiting room (noun): a room with seats where people wait | loc: čekárna
  EN TS: They are in the waiting room.
  cz TS: Jsou v čekárně.
  EN FS: They are in the dining room.
  cz FS: Jsou v jídelně.
  EN TP: sitting in a waiting room
  cz TP: sedět v čekárně
  EN FP: sitting in a living room
  cz FP: sedět v obýváku
4548 | late (adverb): later than usual or expected | loc: pozdě
  EN TS: Oh no, he woke up late!
  cz TS: Ale ne, vstal pozdě!
  EN FS: Oh no, he woke up early!
  cz FS: Ale ne, vstal brzo!
  EN TP: waking up late
  cz TP: vstávat pozdě
  EN FP: working late
  cz FP: pracovat pozdě
4549 | fuel (noun): a substance burned to produce energy | loc: palivo
  EN TS: He is shovelling fuel.
  cz TS: Přehazuje lopatou palivo.
  EN FS: He is shovelling snow.
  cz FS: Přehazuje lopatou sníh.
  EN TP: shovelling black fuel
  cz TP: přehazovat černé palivo
  EN FP: fuel for a rocket
  cz FP: palivo pro raketu
4550 | finally (adverb): after a long delay, at last | loc: konečně
  EN TS: Finally, coffee. She is alive.
  cz TS: Konečně kafe. Už žije.
  EN FS: Finally, tea. She is alive.
  cz FS: Konečně čaj. Už žije.
  EN TP: finally drinking coffee
  cz TP: konečně pít kafe
  EN FP: finally going to bed
  cz FP: konečně jít spát
4551 | camp (verb): to live in a tent | loc: stanovat
  EN TS: Cheap tent. Great camping!
  cz TS: Levný stan. Stanovat je super!
  EN FS: Cheap car. Great camping!
  cz FS: Levné auto. Stanovat je super!
  EN TP: camping by a lake
  cz TP: stanovat u jezera
  EN FP: camping in the snow
  cz FP: stanovat ve sněhu
4553 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: vlasy
  EN TS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the dog.
  cz TS: Jeden kartáč na její vlasy, a pak ten samý na psa.
  EN FS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the cat.
  cz FS: Jeden kartáč na její vlasy, a pak ten samý na kočku.
  EN TP: brushing long dark hair
  cz TP: česání dlouhých tmavých vlasů
  EN FP: dog hair on a sofa
  cz FP: psí chlupy na gauči
4554 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: plamen
  EN TS: A wall of flame, and he keeps cooking.
  cz TS: Stěna plamenů a on klidně vaří dál.
  EN FS: A wall of water, and he keeps cooking.
  cz FS: Stěna vody a on klidně vaří dál.
  EN TP: a wall of orange flame
  cz TP: stěna oranžových plamenů
  EN FP: a candle flame at dinner
  cz FP: plamen svíčky u večeře
4555 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: borovice
  EN TS: Pines below, peaks ahead.
  cz TS: Dole borovice, před námi štíty.
  EN FS: Palms below, peaks ahead.
  cz FS: Dole palmy, před námi štíty.
  EN TP: rows of snowy pines
  cz TP: řady zasněžených borovic
  EN FP: a pine kitchen table
  cz FP: kuchyňský stůl z borovice
4556 | praise (verb): to express approval of someone | loc: chválit
  EN TS: The whole team is praising him.
  cz TS: Celý tým ho chválí.
  EN FS: The whole team is ignoring him.
  cz FS: Celý tým ho ignoruje.
  EN TP: praising a colleague
  cz TP: chválit kolegu
  EN FP: praising a dog
  cz FP: chválit psa
4557 | lap (noun): the top of your thighs when you sit | loc: klín
  EN TS: The dog stole his lap!
  cz TS: Pes mu ukradl klín!
  EN FS: The cat stole his lap!
  cz FS: Kočka mu ukradla klín!
  EN TP: a dog on his lap
  cz TP: pes na jeho klíně
  EN FP: a lap around the track
  cz FP: kolo na dráze
4558 | support (noun): help given to a person or cause | loc: podpora
  EN TS: His friends are his support.
  cz TS: Kamarádi jsou jeho podpora.
  EN FS: His parents are his support.
  cz FS: Rodiče jsou jeho podpora.
  EN TP: support from friends
  cz TP: podpora od kamarádů
  EN FP: support from his parents
  cz FP: podpora od rodičů
4559 | console (verb): to give emotional strength to someone sad | loc: utěšit
  EN TS: Friends are consoling him.
  cz TS: Kamarádi ho utěšují.
  EN FS: Friends are teasing him.
  cz FS: Kamarádi ho škádlí.
  EN TP: consoling a crying friend
  cz TP: utěšovat plačícího kamaráda
  EN FP: playing on a console
  cz FP: hrát na konzoli
4560 | crew (noun): the men and women who run a ship or aircraft | loc: posádka
  EN TS: The crew is rowing in time.
  cz TS: Posádka vesluje do rytmu.
  EN FS: The crew is singing in time.
  cz FS: Posádka zpívá do rytmu.
  EN TP: a rowing crew
  cz TP: veslařská posádka
  EN FP: a film crew
  cz FP: filmový štáb
4561 | command (noun): an instruction with authority to do something | loc: povel
  EN TS: She is shouting commands.
  cz TS: Křičí povely.
  EN FS: She is whispering commands.
  cz FS: Šeptá povely.
  EN TP: shouting commands
  cz TP: křičet povely
  EN FP: typing commands
  cz FP: psát příkazy
4562 | direction (noun): the line leading to a place | loc: směr
  EN TS: She is checking the direction. Serious face.
  cz TS: Kontroluje směr. Vážný výraz.
  EN FS: She is checking the time. Serious face.
  cz FS: Kontroluje čas. Vážný výraz.
  EN TP: finding the right direction
  cz TP: najít správný směr
  EN FP: asking for directions
  cz FP: ptát se na cestu
4563 | law (noun): a legal document of rules for an activity | loc: zákon
  EN TS: The law book has gold corners.
  cz TS: Kniha zákonů má zlaté rohy.
  EN FS: The law book has iron corners.
  cz FS: Kniha zákonů má železné rohy.
  EN TP: a huge book of law
  cz TP: obří kniha zákonů
  EN FP: breaking the law
  cz FP: porušit zákon
4564 | cooperation (noun): working together, joint action | loc: spolupráce
  EN TS: The barn needs cooperation.
  cz TS: Stodola potřebuje spolupráci.
  EN FS: The boat needs cooperation.
  cz FS: Loď potřebuje spolupráci.
  EN TP: cooperation at a barn raising
  cz TP: spolupráce při stavbě stodoly
  EN FP: cooperation between countries
  cz FP: spolupráce mezi státy
4565 | globe (noun): an object shaped like a ball | loc: koule
  EN TS: The Earth looks like a globe.
  cz TS: Země vypadá jako koule.
  EN FS: The Moon looks like a globe.
  cz FS: Měsíc vypadá jako koule.
  EN TP: a blue and green globe
  cz TP: modrozelená koule
  EN FP: a globe on a desk
  cz FP: glóbus na stole
4566 | summit (noun): the top point of a mountain or hill | loc: vrchol
  EN TS: She is reaching the summit!
  cz TS: Už je skoro na vrcholu!
  EN FS: She is reaching the river!
  cz FS: Už je skoro u řeky!
  EN TP: reaching the summit
  cz TP: dosáhnout vrcholu
  EN FP: a summit of world leaders
  cz FP: vrcholná schůzka lídrů
4567 | ill (adjective): affected by a physical or mental problem | loc: nemocný
  EN TS: She looks a bit ill.
  cz TS: Vypadá trochu nemocně.
  EN FS: She looks very happy.
  cz FS: Vypadá moc šťastně.
  EN TP: ill and coughing
  cz TP: nemocná a kašle
  EN FP: ill in bed
  cz FP: nemocná v posteli
4568 | continent (noun): one of the large landmasses of the earth | loc: kontinent
  EN TS: She is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  cz TS: Ona skáče po všech kontinentech. Levné cestování!
  EN FS: He is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  cz FS: On skáče po všech kontinentech. Levné cestování!
  EN TP: jumping on a continent
  cz TP: skákat po kontinentu
  EN FP: drawing a continent
  cz FP: kreslit kontinent
4569 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: smažit
  EN TS: He is frying fish. Van life!
  cz TS: Smaží rybu. Život ve vanu!
  EN FS: He is frying eggs. Van life!
  cz FS: Smaží vajíčka. Život ve vanu!
  EN TP: frying fish in a van
  cz TP: smažit rybu v dodávce
  EN FP: frying fish on a boat
  cz FP: smažit rybu na lodi
4570 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: šéfkuchař
  EN TS: The chef is plating pork.
  cz TS: Šéfkuchař servíruje vepřové.
  EN FS: The chef is plating fish.
  cz FS: Šéfkuchař servíruje rybu.
  EN TP: a chef plating a dish
  cz TP: šéfkuchař aranžuje talíř
  EN FP: a chef eating a dish
  cz FP: šéfkuchař jí jídlo
4571 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: tlačit
  EN TS: Everyone is pushing the boat.
  cz TS: Všichni tlačí loď.
  EN FS: Everyone is pushing the car.
  cz FS: Všichni tlačí auto.
  EN TP: pushing a boat to sea
  cz TP: tlačit loď do moře
  EN FP: pushing a car uphill
  cz FP: tlačit auto do kopce
4572 | correct (verb): to make something right | loc: opravit
  EN TS: She will correct them forever.
  cz TS: Ona je bude opravovat navždy.
  EN FS: He will correct them forever.
  cz FS: On je bude opravovat navždy.
  EN TP: correcting exam papers
  cz TP: opravovat písemky
  EN FP: correcting her posture
  cz FP: opravovat si držení těla
4573 | secret (adjective): kept private, not open or public | loc: tajný
  EN TS: A secret deal over cash.
  cz TS: Tajná dohoda nad hotovostí.
  EN FS: A secret deal over coffee.
  cz FS: Tajná dohoda nad kafem.
  EN TP: a secret cash deal
  cz TP: tajný obchod s hotovostí
  EN FP: a secret love letter
  cz FP: tajný milostný dopis
4575 | cold (noun): a mild viral infection of the nose and throat | loc: rýma
  EN TS: Her cold came to the library.
  cz TS: Přišla s rýmou do knihovny.
  EN FS: Her cold came to the cinema.
  cz FS: Přišla s rýmou do kina.
  EN TP: a cold in the library
  cz TP: rýma v knihovně
  EN FP: a cold in the snow
  cz FP: rýma ve sněhu
4576 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: počítat
  EN TS: She is counting a mountain of paper.
  cz TS: Počítá horu papírů.
  EN FS: She is counting a mountain of coins.
  cz FS: Počítá horu mincí.
  EN TP: counting sheets of paper
  cz TP: počítat listy papíru
  EN FP: counting coins on a table
  cz FP: počítat mince na stole
4577 | country (noun): the territory of a nation | loc: země
  EN TS: She is showing us her country.
  cz TS: Ukazuje nám svou zemi.
  EN FS: She is showing us her ship.
  cz FS: Ukazuje nám svou loď.
  EN TP: a country of fields
  cz TP: země plná polí
  EN FP: a country house
  cz FP: venkovský dům
4578 | crop (noun): what plants yield in one growing season | loc: úroda
  EN TS: Crop fields form a patchwork.
  cz TS: Pole s úrodou tvoří mozaiku.
  EN FS: Car parks form a patchwork.
  cz FS: Parkoviště tvoří mozaiku.
  EN TP: fields of green crops
  cz TP: pole zelené úrody
  EN FP: a crop of apples
  cz FP: úroda jablek
4579 | abroad (adverb): to or in a foreign country | loc: v zahraničí
  EN TS: She travels abroad a lot!
  cz TS: Pořád je v zahraničí!
  EN FS: She stays at home a lot!
  cz FS: Pořád je doma!
  EN TP: travelling abroad
  cz TP: cestovat v zahraničí
  EN FP: studying abroad
  cz FP: studovat v zahraničí
4580 | date (noun): a meeting arranged in advance | loc: rande
  EN TS: Their date has one milkshake.
  cz TS: Na jejich rande je jen jeden milkshake.
  EN FS: Their date has one pizza.
  cz FS: Na jejich rande je jen jedna pizza.
  EN TP: a milkshake date
  cz TP: rande s milkshakem
  EN FP: the date on a calendar
  cz FP: datum v kalendáři
4581 | candy (noun): a sweet made of flavored sugar | loc: bonbon
  EN TS: A blanket den full of candy.
  cz TS: Bunkr z dek plný bonbonů.
  EN FS: A blanket den full of books.
  cz FS: Bunkr z dek plný knih.
  EN TP: a bowl of candy
  cz TP: miska bonbonů
  EN FP: a candy shop window
  cz FP: výloha s bonbony
4582 | measure (verb): to find the size or measurements of something | loc: měřit
  EN TS: An adult is measuring them.
  cz TS: Dospělý je měří.
  EN FS: An adult is feeding them.
  cz FS: Dospělý je krmí.
  EN TP: to measure who is taller
  cz TP: měřit, kdo je vyšší
  EN FP: to measure a room
  cz FP: měřit pokoj
4583 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: lýtko
  EN TS: Ouch! He is holding his calf.
  cz TS: Au! Drží se za lýtko.
  EN FS: Ouch! He is holding his head.
  cz FS: Au! Drží se za hlavu.
  EN TP: a cramp in his calf
  cz TP: křeč v lýtku
  EN FP: a calf in a field
  cz FP: tele na louce
4584 | trail (noun): a track or mark left by something passing | loc: stopa
  EN TS: The turtle left a trail.
  cz TS: Želva zanechala stopu.
  EN FS: The crab left a trail.
  cz FS: Krab zanechal stopu.
  EN TP: a trail of flipper prints
  cz TP: stopa od ploutví
  EN FP: a hiking trail
  cz FP: turistická stezka
4585 | crossing (noun): traveling across something | loc: přechod
  EN TS: Beret, baguette, stylish crossing.
  cz TS: Baret, bageta, stylový přechod.
  EN FS: Beret, guitar, stylish crossing.
  cz FS: Baret, kytara, stylový přechod.
  EN TP: a crossing with a baguette
  cz TP: přechod s bagetou
  EN FP: a border crossing by car
  cz FP: hraniční přechod autem
4586 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: přechod pro chodce
  EN TS: She is on the crosswalk.
  cz TS: Je na přechodu pro chodce.
  EN FS: She is on the bridge.
  cz FS: Je na mostě.
  EN TP: a busy Paris crosswalk
  cz TP: rušný přechod pro chodce v Paříži
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the snow
  cz FP: přechod pro chodce ve sněhu
4587 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: cyklista
  EN TS: No way! The cyclist is surprised.
  cz TS: Cože?! Cyklista je v šoku.
  EN FS: No way! The cyclist is sleeping.
  cz FS: Cože?! Cyklista spí.
  EN TP: a cyclist at a junction
  cz TP: cyklista na křižovatce
  EN FP: a cyclist at a race
  cz FP: cyklista na závodě
4588 | traffic (noun): the vehicles and people moving along a place | loc: provoz
  EN TS: The traffic is stopped.
  cz TS: Provoz stojí.
  EN FS: The traffic is moving.
  cz FS: Provoz jede.
  EN TP: stopped traffic at night
  cz TP: stojící provoz v noci
  EN FP: heavy traffic in the day
  cz FP: hustý provoz ve dne
4589 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: chodec
  EN TS: So many pedestrians!
  cz TS: Tolik chodců!
  EN FS: So many cyclists!
  cz FS: Tolik cyklistů!
  EN TP: pedestrians on a junction
  cz TP: chodci na křižovatce
  EN FP: a pedestrian zone with shops
  cz FP: pěší zóna s obchody
4590 | vacation (noun): leisure time away from work for rest or fun | loc: dovolená
  EN TS: Vacation mode: big splash!
  cz TS: Režim dovolená: velký šplouch!
  EN FS: Vacation mode: long nap!
  cz FS: Režim dovolená: dlouhý šlofík!
  EN TP: a vacation on a ship
  cz TP: dovolená na lodi
  EN FP: a vacation on a train
  cz FP: dovolená ve vlaku
4591 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: loď
  EN TS: The ship offers a pool on the top deck.
  cz TS: Loď nabízí bazén na horní palubě.
  EN FS: The ship offers a cinema on the top deck.
  cz FS: Loď nabízí kino na horní palubě.
  EN TP: a big passenger ship
  cz TP: velká osobní loď
  EN FP: a big cargo ship
  cz FP: velká nákladní loď
4592 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: chodidlo
  EN TS: Wine made with feet. Tasty?
  cz TS: Víno dělané chodidly. Dobrota?
  EN FS: Beer made with feet. Tasty?
  cz FS: Pivo dělané chodidly. Dobrota?
  EN TP: bare feet in grapes
  cz TP: bosá chodidla v hroznech
  EN FP: bare feet in the sand
  cz FP: bosá chodidla v písku
4593 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: nemocnice
  EN TS: He is walking in the hospital.
  cz TS: Jde po nemocnici.
  EN FS: He is running in the hospital.
  cz FS: Běží po nemocnici.
  EN TP: a long hospital corridor
  cz TP: dlouhá chodba nemocnice
  EN FP: a hospital car park
  cz FP: parkoviště nemocnice
